Akira Taue
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2000–2013; regular appearances.
Position on the card: Main event; former GHC Heavyweight Champion.
Wrestling style: Power-based with sumo influences.
Signature moves: Dynamic Bomb, Nodowa Otoshi (chokeslam), Ore Ga Taue (sitout side slam).
Brief description: Akira Taue, transitioning from All Japan Pro Wrestling, became a foundational member of Pro Wrestling NOAH in 2000. He captured the GHC Heavyweight Championship in 2005, solidifying his main event status. Post-retirement in 2013, Taue served as NOAH's president from 2009 to 2016, contributing significantly to the promotion's leadership.

ACH
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2016–2017; regular appearances.
Position on the card: Junior heavyweight division; GHC Junior Heavyweight Tag Team Champion.
Wrestling style: High-flyer with strong athleticism.
Signature moves: Midnight Star (450° splash), Dragon Fly (suicide dive into a DDT), Big Bang Attack (brainbuster).
Brief description: ACH participated in NOAH's junior heavyweight division, notably teaming with Taiji Ishimori to win the GHC Junior Heavyweight Tag Team Championship in 2016. His tenure showcased his high-energy style and contributed to NOAH's tag team scene.

Adam Brooks
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2019; sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Junior heavyweight division; mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flyer with technical elements.
Signature moves: Swanton Bomb, Brainbuster, Slice of Heaven (springboard kick).
Brief description: Australian wrestler Adam Brooks made several appearances in NOAH during 2019, competing in the junior heavyweight division. His matches highlighted his agility and technical prowess, adding international flair to NOAH's roster.

Akebono
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2015; sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Main event; GHC Tag Team Champion.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with sumo background.
Signature moves: Yokozuna Press, Body Avalanche, Running Splash.
Brief description: Former sumo champion Akebono competed in NOAH in 2015, capturing the GHC Tag Team Championship with partner Takeshi Morishima. His imposing presence and sumo background brought a unique dynamic to NOAH's heavyweight division.

Akitoshi Saito
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2000–present; regular appearances.
Position on the card: Mid to upper card; GHC Tag Team Champion.
Wrestling style: Strong style with martial arts influence.
Signature moves: Sickle of Death (STO), Death Brand (piledriver), Roundhouse kick.
Brief description: Akitoshi Saito has been a stalwart in NOAH since its inception, known for his hard-hitting style. He has held the GHC Tag Team Championship multiple times, often teaming with Bison Smith and Jun Akiyama, contributing significantly to NOAH's tag team division.

Alejandro
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2020–present; regular appearances.
Position on the card: Junior heavyweight division; mid-card.
Wrestling style: Luchador with high-flying techniques.
Signature moves: Tornillo, Springboard Arm Drag, Moonsault.
Brief description: Alejandro, formerly known as Masked Monkey, joined NOAH in 2020, bringing a luchador flair to the junior heavyweight division. His high-flying style and vibrant persona have made him a fan favorite, adding diversity to NOAH's roster.

Alejandro Saez
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2014, 2016–2017; sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Junior heavyweight division; mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flyer with technical elements.
Signature moves: 450° splash, Dragon Fly (suicide dive into a DDT), Brainbuster.
Brief description: Chilean wrestler Alejandro Saez, also known as Xtra Large, made his Japanese debut with NOAH in 2014. He returned in 2016 to participate in the Global League, facing top talents like Naomichi Marufuji and Go Shiozaki. His tenure showcased his agility and added international diversity to NOAH's junior heavyweight division.

Alexander Hammerstone
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2019; guest appearances.
Position on the card: Heavyweight division; mid-card.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with technical proficiency.
Signature moves: Nightmare Pendulum (swinging side slam), Spinning spinebuster, Bicycle kick.
Brief description: Representing Major League Wrestling (MLW), Alexander Hammerstone participated in NOAH's 2019 N-1 Victory tournament as part of a talent exchange between MLW and NOAH. His involvement highlighted his strength and versatility, contributing to NOAH's heavyweight competition.

Alejandro
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2018; 2021–present; regular appearances.
Position on the card: Junior heavyweight division; mid-card.
Wrestling style: Luchador with high-flying techniques.
Signature moves: Tornillo, Springboard Arm Drag, Moonsault.
Brief description: Debuting in NOAH in 2018, Alejandro became a regular competitor from 2021, aligning with the "All Rebellion" stable. His luchador style and vibrant persona have made him a fan favorite, adding a dynamic flair to NOAH's junior heavyweight division.

AMAKUSA
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2020–present; regular appearances.
Position on the card: Junior heavyweight division; GHC Junior Heavyweight Champion.
Wrestling style: High-flyer with a focus on agility and speed.
Signature moves: Moonsault, 450° splash, Superkick.
Brief description: AMAKUSA has been a prominent figure in NOAH's junior heavyweight division since 2020. His high-flying style and resilience led him to capture the GHC Junior Heavyweight Championship, solidifying his status as a key player in the division.

Alpha Wolf
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2022–present; guest appearances.
Position on the card: Junior heavyweight division; mid-card.
Wrestling style: Luchador with a mix of aerial and technical maneuvers.
Signature moves: Tope Suicida, Springboard Cutter, Enzuigiri.
Brief description: Alpha Wolf, a freelancer, has made guest appearances in NOAH starting in 2022. His luchador background and dynamic in-ring style have added excitement to NOAH's junior heavyweight matches.

Anthony Greene
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2022–2024; regular appearances.
Position on the card: Junior heavyweight division; GHC Tag Team Champion.
Wrestling style: Technical with high-flying elements.
Signature moves: So Much Prettier (Unprettier), 450° splash, Superkick.
Brief description: Anthony Greene debuted in Pro Wrestling NOAH in July 2022, quickly integrating into the roster. He aligned with the "Good Looking Guys" stable and, alongside Jack Morris, captured the GHC Tag Team Championship in September 2023. Their reign lasted 266 days, marking Greene's significant impact in NOAH's tag team division.

Atsushi Aoki
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2005–2012; regular appearances.
Position on the card: Junior heavyweight division; GHC Junior Heavyweight Tag Team Champion.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with submission focus.
Signature moves: Assault Point (double-arm DDT), Cross armbreaker, German suplex.
Brief description: Atsushi Aoki began his career in NOAH, participating in the "Shining Magic 10 Match Series" to gain experience against top talent. He achieved success in the junior heavyweight division, notably winning the GHC Junior Heavyweight Tag Team Championship. Aoki's tenure in NOAH established him as a skilled technician before he transitioned to All Japan Pro Wrestling in 2012.

Arisu Endo
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2021–2022; guest appearances.
Position on the card: Women's division; undercard.
Wrestling style: High-flyer with a focus on agility.
Signature moves: Diving crossbody, Dropkick, Moonsault.
Brief description: Primarily affiliated with Tokyo Joshi Pro-Wrestling (TJPW), Arisu Endo participated in NOAH events during the CyberFight Festival cross-promotions in 2021 and 2022. Teaming with fellow TJPW talent, she showcased her high-flying abilities, contributing to the collaborative spirit between NOAH and TJPW.

Atsushi Kotoge
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2012–present; regular appearances.
Position on the card: Junior heavyweight division; multiple-time GHC Junior Heavyweight Champion and GHC Junior Heavyweight Tag Team Champion.
Wrestling style: High-flyer with technical proficiency.
Signature moves: Killswitch (Unprettier), Moonsault, Diving elbow drop.
Brief description: Atsushi Kotoge transitioned from Osaka Pro Wrestling to NOAH in 2012, quickly establishing himself in the junior heavyweight division. He has held the GHC Junior Heavyweight Championship multiple times and is a record eleven-time GHC Junior Heavyweight Tag Team Champion. Kotoge's dynamic in-ring style and resilience have made him a cornerstone of NOAH's junior heavyweight scene. ​
Wikipedia

AXIZ
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2018–2021; regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division; three-time GHC Tag Team Champions.
Wrestling style: Combination of strong style strikes and technical wrestling.
Signature moves: Chop/Kick combination, Vertical Spike (brainbuster).
Brief description: AXIZ, consisting of Go Shiozaki and Katsuhiko Nakajima, formed in 2018 and quickly became a dominant force in NOAH's tag team division. Their synergy and combined experience led them to capture the GHC Tag Team Championship three times. Both members are also accomplished singles competitors, with Shiozaki being a multiple-time GHC Heavyweight Champion.

​Bison Smith
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2005–2011; regular appearances.
Position on the card: Main event; two-time GHC Tag Team Champion.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with a focus on strength and aggression.
Signature moves: Bisontennial (spinning side slam), Iron Claw Slam, Lariat.
Brief description: Bison Smith debuted in Pro Wrestling NOAH in 2005, quickly establishing himself as a dominant force in the heavyweight division. Teaming with Akitoshi Saito, he won the GHC Tag Team Championship on May 23, 2008, and again with Keith Walker on April 14, 2010. Smith's imposing presence and powerful in-ring style made him a formidable competitor in NOAH's tag team scene. ​

B.J. Whitmer
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2001, 2005; sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Junior heavyweight division; mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with a strong striking game.
Signature moves: Exploder Suplex, Wrist-Clutch Exploder, Frog Splash.
Brief description: B.J. Whitmer toured with Pro Wrestling NOAH in June 2001, teaming with fellow gaijins Matt Murphy and 2 Cold Scorpio. He participated in the GHC Junior Heavyweight Tournament but was eliminated by Tsuyoshi Kikuchi. Whitmer returned in 2005, competing in several matches that showcased his technical prowess and resilience. ​

Bobby Fish
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2006–2013; regular appearances.
Position on the card: Junior heavyweight division; GHC Junior Heavyweight Tag Team Champion.
Wrestling style: Striker with a strong martial arts background.
Signature moves: Fish Hook Deluxe Edition (heel hook), Falcon Arrow, Roundhouse Kick.
Brief description: Bobby Fish competed in Pro Wrestling NOAH's junior heavyweight division, where he formed a successful tag team with Eddie Edwards. The duo captured the GHC Junior Heavyweight Tag Team Championship on May 25, 2012, showcasing Fish's striking ability and technical prowess. His tenure in NOAH helped elevate his international profile. (en.wikipedia.org)

Briscoe Brothers (Jay and Mark Briscoe)
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2007–2009; regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division; GHC Junior Heavyweight Tag Team Champions.
Wrestling style: Combination of brawling and high-flying tactics.
Signature moves: Doomsday Device, Jay Driller (Jay's double underhook piledriver), Froggy Bow (Mark's diving elbow drop).
Brief description: The Briscoe Brothers brought their unique blend of brawling and aerial maneuvers to NOAH's tag team division. They captured the GHC Junior Heavyweight Tag Team Championship on January 21, 2007, defeating Yoshinobu Kanemaru and Tsuyoshi Kikuchi. Their tenure in NOAH solidified their reputation as a formidable tag team on the international stage. (en.wikipedia.org)

Bryan Danielson
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2004–2009; sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Junior heavyweight division; mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with submission expertise.
Signature moves: Cattle Mutilation (bridging double chickenwing), Regal-Plex, Diving Headbutt.
Brief description: Bryan Danielson, known for his technical mastery, made several appearances in NOAH, often through talent exchanges with Ring of Honor. He competed against top talents like KENTA (Hideo Itami), delivering matches that highlighted his submission skills and in-ring psychology. His NOAH appearances contributed to his development as one of the premier technical wrestlers globally. (en.


Bull Buchanan
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2007–2010; regular appearances.
Position on the card: Heavyweight division; GHC Tag Team Champion.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with brawling techniques.
Signature moves: Bisontennial (spinning side slam), Iron Claw Slam, Lariat.
Brief description: Bull Buchanan debuted in Pro Wrestling NOAH on May 17, 2007, aligning with D'Lo Brown and Taka Michinoku to reform the Roughly Obsess and Destroy (RO&D) faction. On October 27, 2007, Buchanan and Brown won the GHC Tag Team Championship by accumulating the most points in a decision tournament. They held the titles until October 31, 2007, when they lost to Naomichi Marufuji and Takashi Sugiura. Buchanan continued to compete in NOAH's tag team division until his departure in 2010. 

Chris Hero
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2009–2011, 2014–2015; regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division; GHC Tag Team Championship contender.
Wrestling style: Striker with technical proficiency.
Signature moves: Rolling Elbow, Death Blow (discus elbow smash), Hero's Welcome (cravate cutter).
Brief description: Chris Hero began competing in Pro Wrestling NOAH in 2009, often teaming with Claudio Castagnoli as the Kings of Wrestling. They participated in multiple Global Tag League tournaments and challenged for the GHC Tag Team Championship. Hero returned to NOAH in 2014, teaming with Colt Cabana in the Global Tag League, where they earned the Technique Award. His tenure in NOAH showcased his striking ability and adaptability in tag team competition. ​

Claudio Castagnoli
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2008–2011; regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division; GHC Tag Team Championship contender.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with power moves.
Signature moves: Ricola Bomb (sitout powerbomb), Swiss Death (pop-up European uppercut), Giant Swing.
Brief description: Claudio Castagnoli debuted in NOAH in 2008, primarily teaming with Chris Hero as the Kings of Wrestling. They participated in the Global Tag League and challenged for the GHC Tag Team Championship. Castagnoli's combination of strength and technical skill made him a standout performer during his NOAH tenure. ​

Chris Ridgeway
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2019–2023; regular appearances.
Position on the card: Junior heavyweight division; two-time GHC Junior Heavyweight Tag Team Champion.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with a focus on submissions.
Signature moves: Ankle Lock, Penalty Kick, Bridging German Suplex.
Brief description: Chris Ridgeway began competing in NOAH in 2019, showcasing his technical prowess in the junior heavyweight division. He achieved success as a two-time GHC Junior Heavyweight Tag Team Champion, partnering with Yoshinari Ogawa and later with Daga. Ridgeway's tenure in NOAH highlighted his submission-based offense and adaptability in tag team competition. ​

Cody Hall
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2017–2019; regular appearances.
Position on the card: Heavyweight division; mid-card.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with brawling tactics.
Signature moves: Razor's Edge (crucifix powerbomb), Big Boot, Fallaway Slam.
Brief description: Cody Hall, son of wrestling legend Scott Hall, competed in NOAH's heavyweight division from 2017 to 2019. His imposing stature and strength made him a formidable opponent, and he participated in various singles and tag team matches, contributing to NOAH's heavyweight scene. ​

Colt Cabana
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2011–2015; regular appearances.
Position on the card: Heavyweight division; mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Colt 45 (double underhook backbreaker), Flying Apple (corner butt bump), Billy Goat's Curse (reverse Boston crab).
Brief description: Colt Cabana competed in Pro Wrestling NOAH from 2011 to 2015, participating in various tournaments and matches that showcased his technical prowess and charisma. His tenure in NOAH contributed to his international wrestling experience. ​

D'Lo Brown
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2007–2008; regular appearances.
Position on the card: Heavyweight division; GHC Tag Team Champion.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with agility.
Signature moves: Lo Down (frog splash), Sky High (sitout spinebuster), Shaky Shaky Leg Drop.
Brief description: D'Lo Brown joined Pro Wrestling NOAH in 2007, aligning with the Roughly Obsess & Destroy (RO&D) faction. Teaming with Buchanan, he won the GHC Tag Team Championship on October 27, 2007, by accumulating the most points in a decision tournament. They held the titles until October 31, 2007. Brown's tenure in NOAH showcased his versatility and contributed to the promotion's tag team division. ​

Daga
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2019; guest appearances.
Position on the card: Junior heavyweight division; mid-card.
Wrestling style: Luchador with technical and striking elements.
Signature moves: Daga Driver (double underhook piledriver), Springboard Cutter, Superkick.
Brief description: Daga made guest appearances in NOAH during 2019, showcasing his hybrid wrestling style that blends traditional lucha libre with technical prowess. His participation added international flair to NOAH's junior heavyweight division.​

Daiki Inaba
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2020–present; regular appearances.
Position on the card: Heavyweight division; mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with striking.
Signature moves: German Suplex, Lariat, Boston Crab.
Brief description: Daiki Inaba joined NOAH in 2020 after a tenure with Wrestle-1. He quickly integrated into the roster, participating in various singles and tag team matches, and has been a consistent performer in the heavyweight division.

Daisuke Harada
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2013–2023; regular appearances.
Position on the card: Junior heavyweight division; five-time GHC Junior Heavyweight Champion and four-time GHC Junior Heavyweight Tag Team Champion.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with high-speed maneuvers.
Signature moves: Katayama German Suplex, Diving Elbow Drop, Forearm Smash.
Brief description: Daisuke Harada joined Pro Wrestling NOAH in 2013 after a successful tenure with Osaka Pro Wrestling. He quickly became a cornerstone of NOAH's junior heavyweight division, capturing the GHC Junior Heavyweight Championship five times and the GHC Junior Heavyweight Tag Team Championship four times. Harada's technical prowess and leadership qualities solidified his status as a top performer in NOAH. ​
Wikipedia

Daisuke Ikeda
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2000–2001; regular appearances.
Position on the card: Heavyweight division; mid-card.
Wrestling style: Strong style with stiff strikes and submissions.
Signature moves: Brainbuster, Lariat, Crossface Chickenwing.
Brief description: Daisuke Ikeda was part of the original roster when NOAH was founded in 2000. He competed primarily in the mid-card, showcasing a hard-hitting style that resonated with fans of strong style wrestling. Ikeda's tenure in NOAH contributed to the promotion's early reputation for intense, physical matches. ​

Daisuke Sekimoto
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: Sporadic appearances; primarily associated with Big Japan Pro Wrestling.
Position on the card: Heavyweight division; guest competitor.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with a blend of strength and technical ability.
Signature moves: Deadlift German Suplex, Lariat, Argentine Backbreaker.
Brief description: Daisuke Sekimoto, known for his work in Big Japan Pro Wrestling, made occasional appearances in NOAH, bringing his powerful wrestling style to the promotion. While not a regular roster member, his matches in NOAH were well-received, adding a unique dynamic to the heavyweight division. ​
Cagematch

Dangan Yankees (Masato Tanaka & Takashi Sugiura)
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2014–2015; regular appearances as a tag team.
Position on the card: Tag team division; GHC Tag Team Champions.
Wrestling style: Combination of strong style and technical wrestling.
Signature moves: Double Team Elbow Smash, Powerbomb into DDT, Tandem Lariats.
Brief description: Dangan Yankees, consisting of Masato Tanaka and Takashi Sugiura, formed in 2014 and quickly established themselves as a dominant tag team in NOAH. They won the GHC Tag Team Championship and were recognized for their hard-hitting matches and cohesive teamwork. Their alliance brought a new level of intensity to NOAH's tag team division. ​
Wikipedia

Danshoku Dino
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: Occasional appearances; primarily associated with DDT Pro-Wrestling.
Position on the card: Junior heavyweight division; comedic wrestler.
Wrestling style: Eccentric and comedic with unorthodox tactics.
Signature moves: Danshoku Driver (Piledriver), Lip Lock, Danshoku Nightmare.
Brief description: Danshoku Dino, known for his flamboyant and comedic wrestling style in DDT Pro-Wrestling, made special appearances in NOAH, providing entertainment and humor. His unique persona offered a contrast to NOAH's traditional strong style, showcasing the diversity of professional wrestling.​

Dante Leon
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2022–present; regular appearances.
Position on the card: Junior heavyweight division; high-flyer.
Wrestling style: High-flying with aerial maneuvers.
Signature moves: 450 Splash, Moonsault, Tornado DDT.
Brief description: Dante Leon, an American wrestler known for his high-flying style, joined NOAH's junior heavyweight division in 2022. His aerial abilities and energetic performances have quickly made him a standout in the division, contributing to NOAH's dynamic match offerings.​

Davey Boy Smith Jr.
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2015–2016; regular appearances.
Position on the card: Heavyweight division; GHC Tag Team Champion.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with technical proficiency.
Signature moves: Bulldog Bomb (sitout powerbomb), Running Powerslam, Sharpshooter.
Brief description: Davey Boy Smith Jr., as part of the Suzuki-gun faction, invaded Pro Wrestling NOAH in January 2015. Teaming with Lance Archer as the Killer Elite Squad (K.E.S.), they captured the GHC Tag Team Championship twice during their tenure. Their first reign began on February 11, 2015, after defeating TMDK (Mikey Nicholls and Shane Haste), and they held the titles until May 28, 2016. They regained the championship on November 23, 2016, before losing it on December 3, 2016. The Suzuki-gun's invasion significantly impacted NOAH's tag team division during this 

Davey Richards
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2007–2009; regular appearances.
Position on the card: Junior heavyweight division; mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with strong striking ability.
Signature moves: DR Driver (double underhook piledriver), Ankle Lock, Shooting Star Press.
Brief description: Davey Richards made his debut in Pro Wrestling NOAH in 2007, participating in several tours and showcasing his technical prowess and intensity. He often competed in tag team matches and was recognized for his hard-hitting style. Richards' involvement with NOAH helped elevate his international profile and contributed to his development as a prominent figure in the junior heavyweight division. ​

Donovan Morgan
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2001–2006; regular appearances.
Position on the card: Heavyweight division; mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with a focus on suplex variations.
Signature moves: Sayonara (sitout double underhook facebuster), Northern Lights Suplex, Sitout Scoop Slam Piledriver.
Brief description: Donovan Morgan debuted in Pro Wrestling NOAH in 2001, forming the tag team "Excellence, Inc." with Michael Modest. They became mainstays in NOAH's tag team division, often competing against top Japanese talent. Morgan's technical prowess and consistent performances contributed to NOAH's burgeoning international appeal during the early 2000s. ​

Doug Williams
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2003–2005; regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division; GHC Tag Team Champion.
Wrestling style: European technical wrestling with an emphasis on suplexes and submissions.
Signature moves: Chaos Theory (rolling bridging German suplex), Bomb Scare (diving knee drop), Revolution DDT (tornado DDT).
Brief description: Doug Williams brought his European technical style to NOAH, where he teamed with Scorpio to capture the GHC Tag Team Championship. His tenure in NOAH showcased his adaptability and skill, enhancing the promotion's tag team division with his unique wrestling approach. ​

Eddie Edwards
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2005–2013, 2017–2019; regular appearances.
Position on the card: Junior heavyweight and heavyweight divisions; GHC Heavyweight Champion.
Wrestling style: Hybrid of technical wrestling and high-impact strikes.
Signature moves: Die Hard (cross-legged fisherman buster), Achilles Lock, Boston Knee Party (running single-leg high knee).
Brief description: Eddie Edwards began his NOAH career in the junior heavyweight division, gradually transitioning to heavyweight competition. In 2017, he made history by becoming the first foreign wrestler to win the GHC Heavyweight Championship, defeating Katsuhiko Nakajima. Edwards' evolution in NOAH underscores his versatility and resilience across weight classes. ​

Eita
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2020–present; regular appearances.
Position on the card: Junior heavyweight division; GHC Junior Heavyweight Tag Team Champion.
Wrestling style: Lucharesu, blending Japanese and Mexican wrestling styles.
Signature moves: Numero Uno (Modified Yurikamome), Superkick, Moonsault Press.
Brief description: Eita, primarily known for his work in Dragon Gate, began appearing in Pro Wrestling NOAH in 2020. He quickly made an impact in the junior heavyweight division, capturing the GHC Junior Heavyweight Tag Team Championship. Eita's dynamic in-ring style and charisma have contributed to 

El Desperado
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2022; guest appearances.
Position on the card: Junior heavyweight division; special attraction.
Wrestling style: Lucharesu with a focus on technical and high-flying maneuvers.
Signature moves: Pinche Loco (Double underhook facebuster), Numero Dos (Stretch muffler), Guitarra de Angel (Angel's Wings).
Brief description: El Desperado, a prominent figure in New Japan Pro-Wrestling's junior heavyweight division, made notable guest appearances in NOAH during 2022. His matches, particularly against NOAH's top junior heavyweights, were highly acclaimed and added a fresh dynamic to inter-promotional events.​


FUJITA
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2020–present; regular appearances.
Position on the card: Heavyweight division; mid to upper card.
Wrestling style: Strong style with emphasis on strikes and power moves.
Signature moves: Running Knee Strike, Powerbomb, Ankle Lock.
Brief description: Kazuyuki Fujita, known mononymously as FUJITA, is a seasoned wrestler and mixed martial artist who joined Pro Wrestling NOAH in 2020. Bringing a wealth of experience from his tenure in New Japan Pro-Wrestling and mixed martial arts competitions, FUJITA has been a formidable presence in NOAH's heavyweight division. His matches are characterized by intense physicality and a no-nonsense approach, embodying the traditional Japanese strong style. ​
WRESTLE UNIVERSE

FULL THROTTLE
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2020; active as a faction.
Position on the card: Junior heavyweight division; mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and high-speed offense.
Signature moves: Various high-flying maneuvers including dives and aerial attacks.
Brief description: FULL THROTTLE was a junior heavyweight faction in Pro Wrestling NOAH formed in 2020, consisting of wrestlers like Atsushi Kotoge, Hajime Ohara, and Seiki Yoshioka. The group was known for its fast-paced matches and high-energy performances, aiming to invigorate the junior division with their dynamic style. Despite its short-lived run, FULL THROTTLE left an impression with its commitment to high-speed wrestling. ​

Funky Express
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2021–present; active as a faction.
Position on the card: Heavyweight division; mid-card.
Wrestling style: Entertaining style with a mix of comedy and traditional wrestling.
Signature moves: Team-based maneuvers incorporating dance and rhythm elements.
Brief description: Funky Express is a faction in Pro Wrestling NOAH known for its entertaining and light-hearted approach to wrestling. Comprising veterans like Mohammed Yone and Akitoshi Saito, the group combines classic wrestling techniques with comedic elements, often engaging the audience with dance routines and humorous antics. Their unique style provides a contrast to NOAH's typically intense wrestling atmosphere, offering fans a blend of sport and entertainment. ​
WRESTLE UNIVERSE

Funky Powers
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2016–2021; active as a tag team.
Position on the card: Heavyweight tag team division; mid-card.
Wrestling style: Combination of power moves and entertainment.
Signature moves: Double team maneuvers with rhythmic flair.
Brief description: Funky Powers was a tag team in Pro Wrestling NOAH consisting of Mohammed Yone and Quiet Storm. Formed in 2016, the duo was known for blending powerful wrestling techniques with an entertaining, dance-infused persona. They engaged fans with their charismatic performances, contributing to the diversity of NOAH's tag team division until their transition into Funky Express in 2021. ​

Genba Hirayanagi
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2005–2016; regular appearances.
Position on the card: Junior heavyweight division; GHC Junior Heavyweight Tag Team Champion.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Shoryu Genba (Running knee strike), Genba Driver (Fisherman driver), Lariat.
Brief description: Genba Hirayanagi began his career in Pro Wrestling NOAH in 2005 after training under Akira Taue. Initially competing under his real name, Tsutomu Hirayanagi, he later adopted the ring name Genba Hirayanagi. Known for blending technical wrestling with humor, he became a beloved figure in NOAH's junior heavyweight division. In March 2013, he captured the GHC Junior Heavyweight Tag Team Championship alongside Maybach Taniguchi Jr. Hirayanagi retired from professional wrestling on September 10, 2016, concluding an 11-year career. ​

Gedo
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2016; sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Junior heavyweight division; GHC Junior Heavyweight Tag Team Champion.
Wrestling style: Brawler with tactical acumen.
Signature moves: Complete Shot, Superfly Splash, Crossface of JADO (Crossface hold).
Brief description: Primarily associated with New Japan Pro-Wrestling (NJPW), Gedo made notable appearances in Pro Wrestling NOAH in 2016. Teaming with his long-time partner Jado, they challenged for and won the GHC Junior Heavyweight Tag Team Championship on October 8, 2016, by defeating Atsushi Kotoge and Daisuke Harada. Their reign lasted until December 24, 2016, when they lost the titles back to Kotoge and Harada. Gedo's tenure in NOAH, though brief, added prestige to the promotion's junior tag team division. ​

Genichiro Tenryu
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2005; guest appearances.
Position on the card: Heavyweight division; special attraction.
Wrestling style: Strong style with emphasis on chops and lariats.
Signature moves: 53 Sai (Fisherman buster), Lariat, Enzuigiri.
Brief description: Genichiro Tenryu, a legendary figure in Japanese professional wrestling, made special appearances in Pro Wrestling NOAH in 2005. Notably, he teamed with Shiro Koshinaka to face Mitsuharu Misawa and Takeshi Rikio at the Great Voyage 2005 event. Tenryu's involvement brought significant attention to NOAH, bridging generations of wrestling fans and showcasing his enduring in-ring prowess. ​

Giant Bernard
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2005–2006; sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Heavyweight division; guest competitor.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with dominant strength.
Signature moves: Baldo Bomb (Sitout two-handed chokebomb), Derailer (Bicycle kick), Bernard Driver (Inverted piledriver).
Brief description: Giant Bernard, known internationally as Albert or A-Train, made several appearances in Pro Wrestling NOAH between 2005 and 2006. His imposing size and strength added a formidable presence to NOAH's heavyweight division during his guest appearances.​

Go Shiozaki
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2004–2012; 2015–present; regular appearances.
Position on the card: Heavyweight division; multiple-time GHC Heavyweight Champion.
Wrestling style: Strong style with powerful chops and lariats.
Signature moves: Go Flasher (Fisherman driver), Limit Break (Moonsault), Gowan Lariat.
Brief description: Go Shiozaki debuted in Pro Wrestling NOAH in 2004, quickly becoming a protégé of Kenta Kobashi. He captured the GHC Heavyweight Championship five times, a record in the promotion. Shiozaki also held the GHC Tag Team Championship multiple times with various partners. His tenure is marked by resilience and a steadfast commitment to NOAH, embodying the spirit of the promotion. ​
Wikipedia

Hajime Ohara
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2013–present; regular appearances.
Position on the card: Junior heavyweight division; GHC Junior Heavyweight Champion.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with a focus on submission holds.
Signature moves: Muy Bien (Modified camel clutch), German Suplex Hold, Tres Fleur (Three consecutive vertical suplexes).
Brief description: Hajime Ohara joined Pro Wrestling NOAH in 2013, establishing himself as a cornerstone of the junior heavyweight division. Known for his technical prowess and submission expertise, he captured the GHC Junior Heavyweight Championship and the GHC Junior Heavyweight Tag Team Championship multiple times. Ohara's dedication and consistent performances have solidified his status within NOAH.​

The Great Muta
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2001–2023; sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Heavyweight division; special attraction.
Wrestling style: Mysterious persona with unorthodox offense, including mist spraying.
Signature moves: Shining Wizard, Moonsault, Dragon Screw Leg Whip.
Brief description: The Great Muta, an enigmatic persona of Keiji Mutoh, made several appearances in Pro Wrestling NOAH, bringing his mystique and innovative style to the promotion. His matches often served as special attractions, captivating audiences with his unique character and in-ring tactics.​

The Great Kabuki
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2000s; guest appearances.
Position on the card: Heavyweight division; special attraction.
Wrestling style: Martial arts-influenced offense with mist spraying.
Signature moves: Thrust Kick, Asian Mist, Nerve Hold.
Brief description: The Great Kabuki, known for introducing the mist-spraying technique, made guest appearances in Pro Wrestling NOAH during the 2000s. His presence added a classic aura to events, linking NOAH to the rich history of Japanese wrestling.​

The Great Sasuke
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2000s; sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Junior heavyweight division; special attraction.
Wrestling style: High-flying and innovative maneuvers.
Signature moves: Senton Atomico, Sasuke Special (Cartwheel over the top rope into a somersault plancha), Thunder Fire Powerbomb.
Brief description: The Great Sasuke, a pioneer of the junior heavyweight style, made sporadic appearances in Pro Wrestling NOAH during the 2000s. His high-risk offense and charismatic persona added excitement to NOAH's junior division during his guest spots.​

HAYATA
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2016–present; regular appearances.
Position on the card: Junior heavyweight division; multiple-time GHC Junior Heavyweight Champion.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical maneuvers.
Signature moves: Moonsault Press, Headache (Modified armlock), 403 Impact.
Brief description: HAYATA debuted in Pro Wrestling NOAH in December 2016, initially as a freelancer before signing exclusively in September 2017. He quickly established himself in the junior heavyweight division, capturing the GHC Junior Heavyweight Championship five times. HAYATA is also known for his tag team success, notably with YO-HEY, with whom he has held the GHC Junior Heavyweight Tag Team Championship multiple times. His in-ring style combines agility with technical proficiency, making him a standout performer in NOAH's junior division. ​

HARASHIMA
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2017; guest appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division; KO-D Tag Team Champion.
Wrestling style: Striking-based offense with martial arts influence.
Signature moves: Somato (Running double knee strike), Falcon Arrow, Diving double foot stomp.
Brief description: HARASHIMA, primarily associated with Dramatic Dream Team (DDT) Pro-Wrestling, made notable appearances in Pro Wrestling NOAH in 2017. Teaming with NOAH's Naomichi Marufuji, they captured the KO-D Tag Team Championship at Ryōgoku Peter Pan 2017, defeating Shigehiro Irie and Kazusada Higuchi. Their collaboration showcased inter-promotional synergy and highlighted HARASHIMA's versatility across different wrestling platforms. ​

Hideo Itami
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2000–2014; regular appearances.
Position on the card: Junior heavyweight and later heavyweight division; GHC Heavyweight Champion.
Wrestling style: Strike-based offense with strong kicks and stiff strikes.
Signature moves: Go 2 Sleep (Fireman's carry knee strike), Busaiku Knee Kick, Diving Double Foot Stomp.
Brief description: Hideo Itami, known in NOAH as KENTA, began his career in 2000. He became a cornerstone of the promotion, capturing the GHC Junior Heavyweight Championship three times and the GHC Heavyweight Championship once. KENTA's innovative offense, including the creation of the Go 2 Sleep maneuver, influenced many in the wrestling world. He departed NOAH in 2014 to join WWE, returning to the Japanese wrestling scene in 2019 with New Japan Pro-Wrestling. ​

Hideo Saito
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2006–2007; sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Heavyweight division; guest competitor.
Wrestling style: Strong style with a focus on power moves.
Signature moves: Lariat, Brainbuster, Diving Headbutt.
Brief description: Hideo Saito, later known as KAZMA SAKAMOTO, made appearances in Pro Wrestling NOAH between 2006 and 2007. While his tenure was brief, he participated in several notable matches, showcasing his strong style wrestling and contributing to the depth of NOAH's heavyweight division during his time there.​

Hitoshi Kumano
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2013–2020; regular appearances.
Position on the card: Junior heavyweight division; GHC Junior Heavyweight Tag Team Champion.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with a focus on grappling and submissions.
Signature moves: Boston Crab, German Suplex, Missile Dropkick.
Brief description: Hitoshi Kumano debuted in Pro Wrestling NOAH in 2013 and quickly became a fixture in the junior heavyweight division. Known for his technical prowess and resilience, he captured the GHC Junior Heavyweight Tag Team Championship during his tenure. Kumano retired from professional wrestling on March 9, 2020. ​

Holy Demon Army
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2009; reunion appearance.
Position on the card: Heavyweight tag team; special attraction.
Wrestling style: Strong style with emphasis on strikes and power moves.
Signature moves: Powerbomb, Lariat, Chokeslam.
Brief description: The Holy Demon Army, consisting of Toshiaki Kawada and Akira Taue, was a dominant tag team in All Japan Pro Wrestling during the 1990s, holding the World Tag Team Championship a record six times. In 2009, they reunited for a special match in Pro Wrestling NOAH, facing Jun Akiyama and KENTA at the Mitsuharu Misawa Osaka Memorial show on October 3, 2009. ​

Jake Lee
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2023–2024; regular appearances.
Position on the card: Heavyweight division; GHC Heavyweight Champion.
Wrestling style: Strong style with a focus on strikes and submissions.
Signature moves: High-angle Backdrop Suplex, Big Boot, Knee Strike.
Brief description: Jake Lee debuted in Pro Wrestling NOAH on January 1, 2023, aligning with Jack Morris to form the "Good Looking Guys" stable alongside Anthony Greene. On March 17, 2023, Lee defeated Kaito Kiyomiya to capture the GHC Heavyweight Championship, becoming the first wrestler of Korean descent to hold the title. He successfully defended the championship against notable competitors such as Katsuhiko Nakajima, Naomichi Marufuji, and Takashi Sugiura. Lee's reign lasted 223 days, concluding on October 28, 2023, when he lost the title to Kenoh. In April 2024, Lee transitioned to New Japan Pro-Wrestling (NJPW), joining the Bullet Club's War Dogs subgroup. ​

Jack Morris
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2022–present; regular appearances.
Position on the card: Heavyweight division; GHC National Champion; GHC Tag Team Champion.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with agility and striking.
Signature moves: Fisherman Buster, Running Knee Strike, Moonsault.
Brief description: Jack Morris made his NOAH debut during the 2022 N-1 Victory tournament, competing in Block B and securing six points. He quickly became a prominent figure in the promotion, aligning with Jake Lee and Anthony Greene to form the "Good Looking Guys" stable. On September 24, 2023, Morris and Greene captured the GHC Tag Team Championship. Subsequently, on October 28, 2023, Morris defeated El Hijo de Dr. Wagner Jr. to win the GHC National Championship, becoming a double champion. His reign as GHC National Champion ended on April 11, 2024, after four successful defenses. The "Good Looking Guys" stable disbanded on July 13, 2024, following Lee's departure to NJPW. ​

Jado
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2016; sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Junior heavyweight division; GHC Junior Heavyweight Tag Team Champion.
Wrestling style: Brawler with tactical acumen.
Signature moves: Crossface of JADO (Crossface hold), Superfly Splash, Complete Shot.
Brief description: Primarily associated with New Japan Pro-Wrestling (NJPW), Jado made notable appearances in Pro Wrestling NOAH in 2016. Teaming with his long-time partner Gedo, they challenged for and won the GHC Junior Heavyweight Tag Team Championship on October 8, 2016, by defeating Atsushi Kotoge and Daisuke Harada. Their reign lasted until December 24, 2016, when they lost the titles back to Kotoge and Harada. Jado's tenure in NOAH, though brief, added prestige to the promotion's junior tag team division.​


Jinsei Shinzaki
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2001–2005; sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Heavyweight division; guest competitor.
Wrestling style: Traditional Japanese wrestling with spiritual undertones.
Signature moves: Praying Powerbomb, Gokuraku-Gatame (paradise lock), Diving Headbutt.
Brief description: Jinsei Shinzaki, known for his spiritual and stoic persona, made sporadic appearances in Pro Wrestling NOAH between 2001 and 2005. While primarily associated with Michinoku Pro Wrestling, Shinzaki brought his unique in-ring style to NOAH, participating in special attraction matches that highlighted his traditional wrestling approach and added a unique flavor to NOAH's events.​

Joe Doering
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2007–2010; sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Heavyweight division; guest competitor.
Wrestling style: Power-based offense with strong brawling techniques.
Signature moves: Revolution Bomb (spinning powerbomb), Lariat, Spinebuster.
Brief description: Joe Doering, an American powerhouse, made appearances in Pro Wrestling NOAH between 2007 and 2010. While his primary tenure was with All Japan Pro Wrestling (AJPW), Doering's NOAH appearances showcased his imposing strength and brawling style, contributing to the promotion's heavyweight division during his guest spots.​

Jun Akiyama
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2000–2012; regular appearances.
Position on the card: Heavyweight division; three-time GHC Heavyweight Champion.
Wrestling style: Strong style with technical proficiency.
Signature moves: Exploder Suplex, Blue Thunder Driver, Wrist-Clutch Exploder.
Brief description: Jun Akiyama transitioned to Pro Wrestling NOAH in 2000 after departing All Japan Pro Wrestling. He quickly established himself as a top star, becoming the second GHC Heavyweight Champion. Akiyama's tenure in NOAH was marked by multiple championship reigns and significant contributions to the promotion's growth during its early years. ​

Junta Miyawaki
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2016–present; regular appearances.
Position on the card: Junior heavyweight division; emerging talent.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with a focus on submissions.
Signature moves: Modified Guillotine Kick, Kimura Lock.
Brief description: Junta Miyawaki joined the NOAH dojo in April 2016 and made his in-ring debut later that year. Over the years, he has participated in various tournaments and events, gradually rising through the ranks in the junior heavyweight division. ​

Kaito Kiyomiya
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2015–present; regular appearances.
Position on the card: Heavyweight division; three-time GHC Heavyweight Champion.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with a blend of agility and striking.
Signature moves: Tiger Suplex, Shining Wizard, Modified Butterfly Suplex.
Brief description: Kaito Kiyomiya began training at the Pro Wrestling NOAH dojo in March 2015 and made his in-ring debut on December 9, 2015. He quickly ascended the ranks, capturing the GHC Heavyweight Championship for the first time on December 16, 2018, becoming the youngest to hold the title. Kiyomiya's reigns have solidified his status as a central figure in NOAH, and he continues to be a driving force in the promotion's heavyweight division. ​

Katsuhiko Nakajima
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2005–2023; regular appearances.
Position on the card: Junior heavyweight and heavyweight divisions; two-time GHC Heavyweight Champion.
Wrestling style: Strong style with a focus on stiff kicks and strikes.
Signature moves: Vertical Spike (Brainbuster), Diamond Bomb (Sitout Powerbomb), Soccer Ball Kick.
Brief description: Katsuhiko Nakajima debuted in professional wrestling at the age of 15 and joined Pro Wrestling NOAH in 2005. Over his tenure, he transitioned from the junior heavyweight to the heavyweight division, capturing the GHC Heavyweight Championship twice and the GHC Junior Heavyweight Championship three times. Nakajima's hard-hitting style and charisma made him a standout performer. In September 2023, he announced his departure from NOAH to pursue new challenges in his wrestling career. ​

Katsuyori Shibata
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2005–2006; sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Heavyweight division; guest competitor.
Wrestling style: Strong style with emphasis on strikes and submissions.
Signature moves: PK (Penalty Kick), Sleeper Hold, Corner Dropkick.
Brief description: After departing New Japan Pro-Wrestling (NJPW) in 2005, Katsuyori Shibata ventured into freelance work, notably competing in Pro Wrestling NOAH. During his tenure, he engaged in memorable matches, including a notable confrontation with Jun Akiyama. Shibata's hard-hitting style and intense persona left a lasting impression during his appearances in NOAH. ​

Kazuchika Okada
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2009; sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Young lion; early career matches.
Wrestling style: Early career development; foundational skills.
Signature moves: Developing moveset during tenure.
Brief description: Before rising to prominence in NJPW, Kazuchika Okada participated in Pro Wrestling NOAH's tag league in 2009 alongside Hiroyoshi Tenzan. These appearances were part of his early career development, contributing to his growth as a performer. ​

Keiji Muto
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2013, 2017, 2019–2023; sporadic appearances leading to regular involvement.
Position on the card: Main event; GHC Heavyweight Champion.
Wrestling style: Technical prowess blended with high-flying maneuvers.
Signature moves: Shining Wizard, Moonsault, Dragon Screw Leg Whip.
Brief description: Keiji Muto, renowned globally as The Great Muta, initially appeared in Pro Wrestling NOAH in 2013 and 2017 for special matches. Following the suspension of WRESTLE-1 activities in April 2020, Muto began participating in NOAH as a free agent. In February 2021, he captured the GHC Heavyweight Championship, showcasing his enduring skill and star power. Muto's tenure in NOAH culminated with his retirement match on February 21, 2023, at the Tokyo Dome, marking the end of a legendary career that spanned decades. ​

Kenoh
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2014–present; regular appearances.
Position on the card: Junior heavyweight and heavyweight divisions; three-time GHC Heavyweight Champion.
Wrestling style: Hybrid of martial arts strikes and traditional wrestling techniques.
Signature moves: Diving Foot Stomp, PFS (Professional Foot Stomp), Kenka Kick.
Brief description: Kenoh, originally trained in Japanese Kenpo, transitioned to professional wrestling under the mentorship of Jinsei Shinzaki. He debuted in NOAH's junior heavyweight division in 2014, forming a successful tag team with Hajime Ohara, with whom he held the GHC Junior Heavyweight Tag Team Championship twice. In 2017, Kenoh moved to the heavyweight division, capturing the GHC Heavyweight Championship three times. He also led the faction Kongo until its dissolution in 2023, solidifying his status as a central figure in NOAH's roster. ​

Kensuke Sasaki
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2005–2013; sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Heavyweight division; GHC Heavyweight Champion.
Wrestling style: Strong style with powerful strikes and suplexes.
Signature moves: Northern Lights Bomb, Lariat, Strangle Hold Gamma.
Brief description: Kensuke Sasaki, a prominent figure in Japanese professional wrestling, made notable appearances in Pro Wrestling NOAH starting in 2005. He achieved a significant milestone on September 6, 2008, by defeating Takeshi Morishima to win the GHC Heavyweight Championship, making him the first wrestler to have held the top titles in NJPW, AJPW, and NOAH. Sasaki's tenure in NOAH also included memorable matches, such as his bout against Kenta Kobashi at NOAH Destiny 2005. Additionally, through his agency, Kensuke Office (later renamed Diamond Ring), Sasaki and his protégés, including Katsuhiko Nakajima, frequently collaborated with NOAH, enriching its talent pool and storylines. ​

Kenta Kobayashi (KENTA)
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2000–2014, 2018–2019; regular appearances.
Position on the card: Junior heavyweight and heavyweight divisions; GHC Heavyweight Champion; GHC Junior Heavyweight Champion.
Wrestling style: Striking-based offense with martial arts influences.
Signature moves: Go 2 Sleep, Busaiku Knee Kick, Game Over (Omoplata Crossface).
Brief description: KENTA began his career with Pro Wrestling NOAH in 2000, quickly establishing himself as a standout in the junior heavyweight division. He captured the GHC Junior Heavyweight Championship multiple times before transitioning to the heavyweight division, where he won the GHC Heavyweight Championship in 2013. KENTA's hard-hitting style and intense persona made him a fan favorite. In 2014, he departed NOAH to join WWE but returned for a brief stint between 2018 and 2019 before signing with New Japan Pro-Wrestling (NJPW).​

Kenta Kobashi
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2000–2013; regular appearances.
Position on the card: Heavyweight division; GHC Heavyweight Champion.
Wrestling style: Strong style with emphasis on chops and suplexes.
Signature moves: Burning Hammer, Moonsault, Lariat.
Brief description: Kenta Kobashi, one of the most revered figures in professional wrestling, was a founding member of Pro Wrestling NOAH after departing All Japan Pro Wrestling in 2000. He became the inaugural GHC Heavyweight Champion in 2001 and held the title for an unprecedented 735 days. Kobashi's matches, particularly against opponents like Mitsuharu Misawa and Kensuke Sasaki, are considered classics. His bout against Sasaki on July 18, 2005, is especially noted for its intense exchange of chops and is widely acclaimed by fans and critics alike. Kobashi retired in 2013, leaving an indelible mark on NOAH and the wrestling world. ​

Kensuke Office (Diamond Ring)
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2005–2014; collaborative appearances.
Position on the card: Developmental stable and promotion; mid to upper card.
Wrestling style: Varied, encompassing strong style and technical wrestling.
Signature moves: Varied per wrestler.
Brief description: Founded by Kensuke Sasaki in 2005, Kensuke Office served as both a talent agency and wrestling promotion. It was later rebranded as Diamond Ring in 2012. The organization collaborated extensively with Pro Wrestling NOAH, with talents like Katsuhiko Nakajima and Kento Miyahara participating in NOAH events. This partnership provided NOAH with fresh talent and compelling storylines, enriching its programming during the collaboration period. ​

KENSO
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2009–2010; sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Heavyweight division; guest competitor.
Wrestling style: Strong style with a mix of technical wrestling.
Signature moves: Kensuke Lariat, Diving Elbow Drop, Brainbuster.
Brief description: KENSO, formerly known as Kenzo Suzuki in WWE, made appearances in Pro Wrestling NOAH between 2009 and 2010. During his tenure, he competed in the heavyweight division, bringing his international experience to the promotion. KENSO's participation added depth to NOAH's roster during this period.​

Kensuke Sasaki
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2005–2013; sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Heavyweight division; GHC Heavyweight Champion.
Wrestling style: Strong style with powerful strikes and suplexes.
Signature moves: Northern Lights Bomb, Lariat, Strangle Hold Gamma.
Brief description: Kensuke Sasaki, a prominent figure in Japanese professional wrestling, made notable appearances in Pro Wrestling NOAH starting in 2005. He achieved a significant milestone on September 6, 2008, by defeating Takeshi Morishima to win the GHC Heavyweight Championship, making him the first wrestler to have held the top titles in NJPW, AJPW, and NOAH. Sasaki's tenure in NOAH also included memorable matches, such as his bout against Kenta Kobashi at NOAH Destiny 2005. Additionally, through his agency, Kensuke Office (later renamed Diamond Ring), Sasaki and his protégés, including Katsuhiko Nakajima, frequently collaborated with NOAH, enriching its talent pool and storylines.​

KENTA (Kenta Kobayashi)
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2000–2014, 2018–2019; regular appearances.
Position on the card: Junior heavyweight and heavyweight divisions; GHC Heavyweight Champion; GHC Junior Heavyweight Champion.
Wrestling style: Striking-based offense with martial arts influences.
Signature moves: Go 2 Sleep, Busaiku Knee Kick, Game Over (Omoplata Crossface).
Brief description: KENTA began his career with Pro Wrestling NOAH in 2000, quickly establishing himself as a standout in the junior heavyweight division. He captured the GHC Junior Heavyweight Championship multiple times before transitioning to the heavyweight division, where he won the GHC Heavyweight Championship in 2013. KENTA's hard-hitting style and intense persona made him a fan favorite. In 2014, he departed NOAH to join WWE but returned for a brief stint between 2018 and 2019 before signing with New Japan Pro-Wrestling (NJPW).​

Kenta Kobashi
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2000–2013; regular appearances.
Position on the card: Heavyweight division; GHC Heavyweight Champion.
Wrestling style: Strong style with emphasis on chops and suplexes.
Signature moves: Burning Hammer, Moonsault, Lariat.
Brief description: Kenta Kobashi, one of the most revered figures in professional wrestling, was a founding member of Pro Wrestling NOAH after departing All Japan Pro Wrestling in 2000. He became the inaugural GHC Heavyweight Champion in 2001 and held the title for an unprecedented 735 days. Kobashi's matches, particularly against opponents like Mitsuharu Misawa and Kensuke Sasaki, are considered classics. His bout against Sasaki on July 18, 2005, is especially noted for its intense exchange of chops and is widely acclaimed by fans and critics alike. Kobashi retired in 2013, leaving an indelible mark on NOAH and the wrestling world.​

Kings of Wrestling (Chris Hero and Claudio Castagnoli)
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2010–2011; sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division; GHC Tag Team Champions.
Wrestling style: Combination of technical wrestling and striking.
Signature moves: KRS-One (Kings Reign Supreme Over Nearly Everyone), Hero's Welcome, Ricola Bomb.
Brief description: The Kings of Wrestling, consisting of Chris Hero and Claudio Castagnoli, ventured into Pro Wrestling NOAH in late 2010. Their impactful presence led them to capture the GHC Tag Team Championship on October 30, 2010, by defeating Takuma Sano and Yoshihiro Takayama. Their reign showcased their synergy and in-ring prowess, adding prestige to NOAH's tag team division. They eventually lost the titles to Takashi Sugiura and Yoshihiro Takayama on May 25, 2011.​
Wikipedia

Kinya Okada
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2018–present; regular appearances.
Position on the card: Heavyweight division; developing talent.
Wrestling style: Fundamental wrestling with a focus on strikes and submissions.
Signature moves: Boston Crab, Dropkick, Suplex Variations.
Brief description: Kinya Okada joined the NOAH dojo in 2018 and made his in-ring debut on December 7, 2018. As a young lion, he has been honing his skills and gradually climbing the ranks within the promotion. Okada represents the future of NOAH's heavyweight division, showcasing potential and dedication in his performances.​

Kongō
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2019–2023; active stable.
Position on the card: Prominent faction; involved in major storylines.
Wrestling style: Diverse, reflecting individual members' specialties.
Signature moves: Varied per member.
Brief description: Kongō was established in 2019 by Kenoh after expressing dissatisfaction with NOAH's direction. The stable quickly became a dominant force, featuring members like Katsuhiko Nakajima, Masa Kitamiya, and Manabu Soya. Kongō was known for its rebellious attitude and intense matches. The faction dissolved in 2023, marking the end of an influential era in NOAH's history. ​

Kotaro Suzuki
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2001–2012, 2013–2016, 2018–2020; multiple tenures.
Position on the card: Junior heavyweight division; GHC Junior Heavyweight Champion.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical wrestling.
Signature moves: Blue Destiny, Tiger Driver, Endless Waltz.
Brief description: Kotaro Suzuki debuted in NOAH in 2001 and became a cornerstone of the junior heavyweight division. He secured the GHC Junior Heavyweight Championship multiple times and was part of successful tag teams, notably with Atsushi Aoki. Suzuki's agility and technical prowess made him a fan favorite. He departed NOAH in 2020 to pursue opportunities elsewhere. ​

Lance Archer
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2015; sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Heavyweight division; guest competitor.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with agility.
Signature moves: Blackout (Inverted crucifix powerbomb), EBD Claw (Iron Claw), Chokeslam.
Brief description: Lance Archer, primarily known for his work in New Japan Pro-Wrestling (NJPW), made appearances in Pro Wrestling NOAH in 2015. During his tenure, he showcased his formidable strength and agility, contributing to NOAH's heavyweight division.​

Kyoko Inoue
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2001; special appearance.
Position on the card: Special attraction; women's division pioneer.
Wrestling style: Power-based offense with high-energy moves.
Signature moves: Niagara Driver (Sitout powerbomb), Lariat, Diving Back Elbow Drop.
Brief description: Kyoko Inoue, a trailblazer in women's professional wrestling, made a notable appearance in Pro Wrestling NOAH in 2001. Teaming with Jun Akiyama, she faced the duo of Akira Taue and Yoshinobu Kanemaru, marking a rare intergender tag match in NOAH's history.​

Kzy
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2011; guest appearance.
Position on the card: Junior heavyweight division; guest competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and rhythmic offense.
Signature moves: Skayde Schoolboy (Rolling schoolboy), Kzy Time (Diving elbow drop), Impact (Running double knee strike).
Brief description: Kzy, primarily associated with Dragon Gate, made a guest appearance in Pro Wrestling NOAH in 2011. His dynamic in-ring style added a unique flair to the junior heavyweight division during his brief tenure.​

Los Perros del Mal de Japón
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2021–2022; active stable.
Position on the card: Junior heavyweight division; prominent faction.
Wrestling style: Rudo (heel) tactics with a blend of technical and high-flying maneuvers.
Signature moves: Varied per member.
Brief description: Los Perros del Mal de Japón was a Japanese professional wrestling stable in Pro Wrestling NOAH, led by Nosawa Rongai. The group was inspired by the Mexican faction Los Perros del Mal and became popular among NOAH audiences. Members included Nosawa Rongai, Ikuto Hidaka, Eita, Kotaro Suzuki, and Yo-Hey. They engaged in notable feuds with other stables, particularly Stinger, and held championships such as the GHC Junior Heavyweight Tag Team Championship. ​

Low Ki
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2004; guest appearances.
Position on the card: Junior heavyweight division; title contender.
Wrestling style: Hybrid of strong style and high-flying techniques.
Signature moves: Ki Krusher (Fisherman driver), Warrior's Way (Diving double foot stomp), Dragon Clutch (Inverted facelock with body scissors).
Brief description: Low Ki, known for his intense wrestling style, joined Pro Wrestling NOAH in mid-2004 after leaving Pro Wrestling Zero-One. He was immediately thrust into the spotlight with a title shot against GHC Junior Heavyweight Champion Yoshinobu Kanemaru, though he was unsuccessful in capturing the championship. ​

M's Alliance
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2020–2022; active stable.
Position on the card: Prominent faction; involved in major storylines.
Wrestling style: Varied, reflecting individual members' specialties.
Signature moves: Varied per member.
Brief description: M's Alliance was a professional wrestling stable in Pro Wrestling NOAH, formed on June 20, 2020, by Keiji Mutoh, Masaaki Mochizuki, and Naomichi Marufuji. The group was characterized by the inclusion of veteran wrestlers whose surnames or given names started with an 'M'. Yuko Miyamoto joined the stable two days after its formation. The alliance brought together big names like Keiji Mutoh, enhancing NOAH's storytelling and match quality during its active years. ​

Makoto Hashi
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2000–2012; regular appearances.
Position on the card: Junior heavyweight division; GHC Junior Heavyweight Champion.
Wrestling style: Strong style with technical proficiency.
Signature moves: Diving Headbutt, Brainbuster, Lariat.
Brief description: Makoto Hashi debuted in Pro Wrestling NOAH in 2000 and became a notable figure in the junior heavyweight division. He captured the GHC Junior Heavyweight Championship on December 24, 2005, but his reign was notably short, lasting only one day. Hashi also held the GHC Openweight Hardcore Championship and was known for his resilience and technical skills. He retired from professional wrestling in 2012. ​

Manabu Soya
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2020–present; regular appearances.
Position on the card: Heavyweight division; GHC National Champion.
Wrestling style: Strong style with power moves.
Signature moves: Ballistic (Lariat), Death Valley Bomb, Jounetsu DDT.
Brief description: Manabu Soya debuted in Pro Wrestling NOAH on April 19, 2020, joining the Kongō stable led by Kenoh. Since then, he has been an active competitor in NOAH's heavyweight division. Soya captured the GHC National Championship on September 14, 2024, by defeating Ulka Sasaki at NOAH Star Navigation 2024. He successfully defended the title against various challengers, including a notable victory over Tetsuya Endo on February 11, 2025, at NOAH Star Navigation Premium 2025. ​

Mark Briscoe
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2007; guest appearances.
Position on the card: Junior heavyweight tag team division; GHC Junior Heavyweight Tag Team Champion.
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting with a blend of technical and aerial maneuvers.
Signature moves: Cut-Throat Driver, Froggy Bow (Diving elbow drop), Redneck Boogie (Sitout suplex slam).
Brief description: Mark Briscoe, alongside his brother Jay Briscoe, made appearances in Pro Wrestling NOAH in 2007. The Briscoe Brothers captured the GHC Junior Heavyweight Tag Team Championship during their tenure, showcasing their versatility and adaptability in the Japanese wrestling scene. Their time in NOAH added to their reputation as one of the premier tag teams in professional wrestling. ​

Naomichi Marufuji
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2000–present; founding member.
Position on the card: Main event; GHC Heavyweight and Junior Heavyweight Champion.
Wrestling style: Hybrid of technical prowess and high-flying maneuvers.
Signature moves: Shiranui (Sliced Bread #2), Tiger Flowsion, Perfect Key Lock.
Brief description: Naomichi Marufuji is a cornerstone of Pro Wrestling NOAH, known for his versatility across weight divisions. As a founding member, he has held multiple championships, including the GHC Heavyweight and Junior Heavyweight titles. Marufuji's innovative offense and leadership have significantly influenced NOAH's style and direction.​

Masa Kitamiya
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2015–present; regular competitor.
Position on the card: Heavyweight division; GHC Tag Team Champion.
Wrestling style: Strong style with emphasis on power moves.
Signature moves: Saito Suplex, Prison Lock, Spear.
Brief description: Masa Kitamiya, initially trained by Kensuke Sasaki, joined NOAH in 2015. He has been a prominent figure in the heavyweight division, capturing the GHC Tag Team Championship multiple times. Kitamiya's robust in-ring style and resilience have made him a formidable competitor.​
Wikipedia

Masaaki Mochizuki
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2018–2022; intermittent appearances.
Position on the card: Junior heavyweight division; GHC Junior Heavyweight Champion.
Wrestling style: Striker with martial arts background.
Signature moves: Shining Wizard, Twister (Arm-trap crossface), Triangle Kick.
Brief description: Masaaki Mochizuki, primarily associated with Dragon Gate, made notable appearances in NOAH, capturing the GHC Junior Heavyweight Championship. His striking ability and experience added depth to NOAH's junior division.​

Masato Shibata
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2005–2011; regular competitor.
Position on the card: Junior heavyweight division; mid-card wrestler.
Wrestling style: Technical with submission focus.
Signature moves: Cross Armbar, German Suplex, Diving Headbutt.
Brief description: Masato Shibata competed in NOAH's junior heavyweight division, known for his technical skills and resilience. While not a titleholder, he was respected for his work ethic and contributions to the mid-card scene.​

Masato Tanaka
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2014–present; regular appearances.
Position on the card: Heavyweight division; GHC Tag Team Champion.
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting with a blend of hardcore and technical maneuvers.
Signature moves: Sliding D (sliding forearm smash), Roaring Elbow, Tornado DDT.
Brief description: Masato Tanaka, renowned for his resilience and intense wrestling style, began working with Pro Wrestling NOAH in early 2014. Teaming with Takashi Sugiura as part of the "Dangan Yankies" stable, Tanaka captured the GHC Tag Team Championship on May 31, 2014, by defeating Maybach Taniguchi and Takeshi Morishima. The duo also won the Global Tag League in both 2014 and 2015. Tanaka's tenure in NOAH has been marked by high-profile matches and championship pursuits, solidifying his status as a formidable competitor in the promotion. ​

Maybach Taniguchi (Shuhei Taniguchi)
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2005–present; regular appearances.
Position on the card: Heavyweight division; GHC Tag Team Champion.
Wrestling style: Power-based offense with strong style influences.
Signature moves: Maybach Press (Diving body press), Maybach Bomb (Sitout powerbomb), Lariat.
Brief description: Shuhei Taniguchi debuted in Pro Wrestling NOAH on December 24, 2005. In early 2012, he adopted the persona of Maybach Taniguchi, transforming into a more aggressive and villainous character. Throughout his career, Taniguchi has held the GHC Tag Team Championship six times with various partners, including KENTA, Takeshi Morishima, and Naomichi Marufuji. His evolution from a rookie to a seasoned heavyweight competitor showcases his adaptability and enduring presence in NOAH's roster. ​

Mikey Nicholls
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2011–2016; regular appearances.
Position on the card: Heavyweight division; GHC Tag Team Champion.
Wrestling style: Power-based offense with technical proficiency.
Signature moves: Mikey Bomb (Sitout powerbomb), Death Valley Driver, Lariat.
Brief description: Mikey Nicholls, alongside Shane Haste, formed the tag team known as The Mighty Don't Kneel (TMDK). The duo debuted in Pro Wrestling NOAH in 2011 and quickly rose to prominence in the heavyweight tag team division. TMDK captured the GHC Tag Team Championship twice, with their first reign beginning on July 7, 2013, after defeating Toru Yano and Takashi Iizuka. Nicholls' tenure in NOAH was marked by high-energy performances and significant contributions to the tag team scene. ​

Maybach Taniguchi
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2005–present; regular appearances.
Position on the card: Heavyweight division; GHC Tag Team Champion.
Wrestling style: Aggressive powerhouse with brawling tactics.
Signature moves: Maybach Press (Diving body press), Maybach Bomb (Sitout powerbomb), Lariat.
Brief description: Shuhei Taniguchi, known by his ring name Maybach Taniguchi, debuted in Pro Wrestling NOAH on December 24, 2005. Initially portraying a traditional wrestling persona, he underwent a significant transformation in early 2012, adopting the more aggressive "Maybach Taniguchi" character. This change led to multiple GHC Tag Team Championship reigns, partnering with notable wrestlers such as KENTA and Takeshi Morishima. Taniguchi's evolution showcased his versatility and enduring presence in NOAH's heavyweight division. ​


Mitsuharu Misawa
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2000–2009; founder and active competitor.
Position on the card: Main event; inaugural GHC Heavyweight Champion.
Wrestling style: Strong style with a focus on stiff strikes and suplexes.
Signature moves: Emerald Flowsion (sitout side powerslam), Tiger Driver '91 (kneeling head spike double underhook powerbomb), Rolling Elbow.
Brief description: Mitsuharu Misawa, a legendary figure in professional wrestling, founded Pro Wrestling NOAH in 2000 after departing All Japan Pro Wrestling. Under his leadership, NOAH became a prominent promotion in Japan. Misawa was renowned for his intense matches and technical prowess, holding the GHC Heavyweight Championship three times. His career was tragically cut short when he passed away during a match on June 13, 2009. ​

Minoru Suzuki
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2005–2007; regular appearances.
Position on the card: Heavyweight division; GHC Tag Team Champion.
Wrestling style: Shoot style with a focus on submissions and strikes.
Signature moves: Gotch-Style Piledriver, Sleeper Hold, Penalty Kick.
Brief description: Minoru Suzuki, known for his shoot-style wrestling and MMA background, competed in Pro Wrestling NOAH starting in 2005. He challenged Kenta Kobashi for the GHC Heavyweight Championship but was unsuccessful. Suzuki later formed a successful tag team with Naomichi Marufuji, capturing the GHC Tag Team Championship on June 18, 2005. ​

Muhammad Yone
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2002–present; regular competitor.
Position on the card: Heavyweight division; multi-time GHC Tag Team Champion.
Wrestling style: Strong style with a focus on power moves.
Signature moves: Kinniku Buster, Diving Guillotine Drop.
Brief description: Satoshi Yoneyama, known by his ring name Muhammad Yone, is a seasoned wrestler recognized for his distinctive afro hairstyle, earning him the nickname "Mr. Afro." Since joining Pro Wrestling NOAH in 2002, Yone has achieved significant success, including multiple GHC Tag Team Championship reigns with partners such as Takeshi Morishima and Quiet Storm. His charismatic presence and consistent performances have made him a mainstay in NOAH's heavyweight division. ​

Momo No Seishun Tag
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2010–2012, 2015–2016, 2020–2022; intermittent appearances.
Position on the card: Junior heavyweight tag team division; GHC Junior Heavyweight Tag Team Champions.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical maneuvers.
Signature moves: Killing Machine (double-team maneuver), various double-team aerial attacks.
Brief description: Momo No Seishun Tag, comprising Atsushi Kotoge and Daisuke Harada, is a celebrated tag team known for their agility and technical prowess. Originating in Osaka Pro Wrestling, they transitioned to Pro Wrestling NOAH, capturing the GHC Junior Heavyweight Tag Team Championship multiple times. Their dynamic teamwork and resilience have solidified their status as one of NOAH's premier junior heavyweight tag teams. ​

Mushiking Terry (Kotaro Suzuki)
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2005–2007; portrayed by Kotaro Suzuki.
Position on the card: Junior heavyweight division; GHC Junior Heavyweight Champion.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical maneuvers.
Signature moves: Genesis (Sitout double underhook powerbomb), Teradrive (Avalanche sitout hip toss), Death Valley Bomb.
Brief description: Mushiking Terry was a masked persona adopted by Kotaro Suzuki, inspired by the Japanese arcade game "Mushiking: King of the Beetles." Debuting in 2005, Mushiking Terry became a popular character in NOAH's junior heavyweight division. Suzuki, as Mushiking Terry, won the GHC Junior Heavyweight Championship, showcasing his agility and technical prowess. The character was involved in a notable rivalry with Mushiking Joker, portrayed by Ricky Marvin. ​

Mushiking Joker (Ricky Marvin)
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2005–2007; portrayed by Ricky Marvin.
Position on the card: Junior heavyweight division; antagonist to Mushiking Terry.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre with high-flying techniques.
Signature moves: Various aerial maneuvers characteristic of lucha libre.
Brief description: Mushiking Joker was the masked alter ego of Mexican wrestler Ricky Marvin. Introduced as the arch-enemy of Mushiking Terry, the character added a dramatic flair to NOAH's junior heavyweight division. The rivalry between Mushiking Joker and Mushiking Terry was a highlight during their tenure, blending storytelling with athleticism. ​

Naomichi Marufuji
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2000–present; founding member.
Position on the card: Main event; four-time GHC Heavyweight Champion.
Wrestling style: Hybrid of technical prowess and high-flying maneuvers.
Signature moves: Shiranui (Sliced Bread #2), Tiger Flowsion, Perfect Key Lock.
Brief description: Naomichi Marufuji is a cornerstone of Pro Wrestling NOAH, known for his versatility across weight divisions. As a founding member, he has held multiple championships, including the GHC Heavyweight and Junior Heavyweight titles. Marufuji's innovative offense and leadership have significantly influenced NOAH's style and direction. ​

Nigel McGuinness
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: Mid-2000s; participated in tours as a representative of Ring of Honor (ROH).
Position on the card: Mid-card; tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with a strong emphasis on submissions.
Signature moves: Jawbreaker Lariat, London Dungeon (Arm Trap Crossface).
Brief description: Nigel McGuinness, an English professional wrestler renowned for his technical prowess, participated in Pro Wrestling NOAH tours during the mid-2000s. Representing ROH, he often teamed with NOAH talent, notably Takeshi Morishima. McGuinness's involvement in NOAH helped strengthen the relationship between the two promotions and showcased his adaptability in various wrestling styles. ​

NOSAWA Rongai (Kazushige Nosawa)
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2019–2023; wrestler, head booker, and producer.
Position on the card: Junior heavyweight division; GHC Junior Heavyweight Tag Team Champion.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre-influenced with a focus on technical maneuvers.
Signature moves: Ultimate La Magistral (modified rolling cradle).
Brief description: Kazushige Nosawa, known as NOSAWA Rongai, began his tenure with Pro Wrestling NOAH in 2019. He played multiple roles, including wrestler, head booker, and producer. NOSAWA co-founded the Tokyo Gurentai promotion and produced NOAH's "Monday Magic" shows. He was instrumental in forming the stable Los Perros del Mal de Japón, inspired by the Mexican faction Los Perros del Mal. NOSAWA held the GHC Junior Heavyweight Tag Team Championship alongside Eita. He announced his retirement from professional wrestling in 2023. ​

Osamu Nishimura
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: Not prominently associated with NOAH; primarily known for his work in New Japan Pro-Wrestling (NJPW).
Position on the card: Heavyweight division; renowned technical wrestler.
Wrestling style: Classic catch wrestling with an emphasis on mat-based techniques.
Signature moves: Manjigatame (octopus hold), butterfly suplex.
Brief description: Osamu Nishimura was celebrated for his technical wrestling skills, earning acclaim in NJPW and other promotions. While not a central figure in NOAH, his contributions to Japanese wrestling were significant. Nishimura passed away on February 28, 2025, at the age of 53. ​

Paul London
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2012; participated in the NTV G+ Cup Junior Heavyweight Tag League.
Position on the card: Junior heavyweight tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical maneuvers.
Signature moves: Shooting Star Press, 450° Splash.
Brief description: Paul London, known for his tenure in WWE, ventured into Pro Wrestling NOAH in 2012. He teamed up with Zack Sabre Jr. to compete in the NTV G+ Cup Junior Heavyweight Tag League, showcasing his aerial prowess and adaptability in the Japanese wrestling scene. Despite not securing a top position in the tournament, London's participation highlighted his versatility across global wrestling promotions. ​
Wikipedia, l'enciclopedia libera

Psycho Clown
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2023; challenged for the GHC National Championship.
Position on the card: Challenger for the GHC National Championship.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre with a focus on high-flying and brawling techniques.
Signature moves: La Silla (diving seated senton), Tope Suicida.
Brief description: Psycho Clown, a prominent figure in Mexican lucha libre, made his Pro Wrestling NOAH debut in 2023. He faced El Hijo de Dr. Wagner Jr. for the GHC National Championship at NOAH Grand Ship in Nagoya on September 24, 2023. Despite a valiant effort, Psycho Clown was unsuccessful in capturing the title. His appearance marked a significant cultural exchange between Mexican lucha libre and Japanese puroresu. ​

Ricky Marvin
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2005–2015; regular competitor.
Position on the card: Junior heavyweight division; GHC Junior Heavyweight Tag Team Champion.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre with high-flying techniques.
Signature moves: Santa Maria (Diving Corkscrew Moonsault), Tiger Feint Kick.
Brief description: Ricky Marvin, a Mexican luchador, made a significant impact in Pro Wrestling NOAH's junior heavyweight division. He is notably recognized for portraying the character Mushiking Joker, the arch-enemy of Mushiking Terry (Kotaro Suzuki). Marvin's tenure in NOAH was marked by his dynamic in-ring style and contributions to the promotion's international appeal. ​

Rob Van Dam
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2023; special appearance.
Position on the card: Special attraction; participated in high-profile matches.
Wrestling style: Hybrid of martial arts and high-flying maneuvers.
Signature moves: Five-Star Frog Splash, Van Daminator.
Brief description: Rob Van Dam, an internationally acclaimed wrestler, made a special appearance in Pro Wrestling NOAH in 2023. His involvement added star power to the event and showcased his unique wrestling style to the NOAH audience. ​

Richard Slinger
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2000–2005; regular competitor.
Position on the card: Mid-card; participated in singles and tag team matches.
Wrestling style: Strong style with technical elements.
Signature moves: Slinger Suplex (Exploder Suplex), Diving Headbutt.
Brief description: Richard Slinger, an American wrestler, competed in Pro Wrestling NOAH during its early years. He was known for his hard-hitting style and was a reliable mid-card performer, contributing to the promotion's international diversity. ​

Rocky Romero
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2007; made his debut on March 4, 2007, against Mushiking Terry. ​
Position on the card: Junior heavyweight division; participated in singles and tag team matches.​
Wrestling style: Lucha libre-influenced with technical proficiency.​
Signature moves: Diablo Armbar (Cross Armbar), Forever Clothesline.​
Brief description: Rocky Romero, a Cuban-American wrestler, is renowned for his versatility and international experience. In Pro Wrestling NOAH, he competed in the junior heavyweight division, showcasing his lucha libre-inspired style. His tenure in NOAH added to his global wrestling portfolio, enhancing his reputation as a dynamic performer. ​

Roderick Strong
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2009–2013; participated in tours and tournaments. ​
Puroresu System Wiki
Position on the card: Junior heavyweight division; competed in singles and tag team matches.​
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with a focus on backbreakers and strong strikes.​
Signature moves: End of Heartache (Vertical Suplex into a Double Knee Backbreaker), Strong Hold (Boston Crab).​
Brief description: Roderick Strong, known for his technical prowess, expanded his wrestling career by participating in Pro Wrestling NOAH's junior heavyweight division. His involvement in NOAH's tournaments and matches against top talent like KENTA highlighted his adaptability and skill in various wrestling styles. ​

Ryuji Hijikata
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2011–2013; participated in various events and matches.
Position on the card: Mid-card; competed in singles and tag team matches.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with a strong foundation in submissions.
Signature moves: Dynamite Knee (Running Knee Strike), various submission holds.
Brief description: Ryuji Hijikata, known for his technical prowess, competed in Pro Wrestling NOAH between 2011 and 2013. During his tenure, he showcased his submission-based offense and engaged in numerous competitive bouts, contributing to NOAH's rich in-ring action.​

Samoa Joe
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: Samoa Joe did not directly compete in Pro Wrestling NOAH events. However, he had notable interactions with NOAH talent during his tenure in Ring of Honor (ROH). ​
Position on the card: Main event; ROH World Champion during interactions with NOAH talent.​
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting, submission-based offense with influences from Samoan and Japanese wrestling traditions.​
Signature moves: Muscle Buster, Coquina Clutch (Rear Naked Choke).​
Brief description: Samoa Joe, renowned for his intense in-ring style, engaged with Pro Wrestling NOAH talent during his time in ROH. Notably, he had confrontations with NOAH's Takeshi Morishima, leading to a match where Joe emerged victorious. These interactions highlighted the collaborative efforts between ROH and NOAH, showcasing Joe's adaptability against international opponents. ​

Satoshi Kojima
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2022–2023; competed in high-profile matches, including winning the GHC Heavyweight Championship. ​
Position on the card: Main event; GHC Heavyweight Champion.​
Wrestling style: Strong style with powerful lariats and a mix of technical wrestling.​
Signature moves: Lariat, Koji Cutter (Diamond Cutter).​
Brief description: Satoshi Kojima, a seasoned veteran in Japanese professional wrestling, made a significant impact in Pro Wrestling NOAH by capturing the GHC Heavyweight Championship. His tenure in NOAH added to his illustrious career, showcasing his enduring skill and adaptability across major Japanese promotions. ​

Sean Legacy​
For a visual highlight of Satoshi Kojima's participation in Pro Wrestling NOAH, you can watch the following match:​
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2020–2023; active competitor in the junior heavyweight division. ​
Position on the card: Junior heavyweight; GHC Junior Heavyweight Champion.​
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical maneuvers, characteristic of the junior heavyweight division.​
Signature moves: High-speed kicks, aerial assaults.​
Brief description: Seiki Yoshioka joined Pro Wrestling NOAH in 2020, quickly establishing himself in the junior heavyweight division. His agility and technical prowess led him to capture the GHC Junior Heavyweight Championship, solidifying his status as a prominent figure in NOAH's junior ranks.​

Shane Haste
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2011–2016; notable member of The Mighty Don't Kneel (TMDK) tag team. ​
Position on the card: Tag team division; GHC Tag Team Champion.​
Wrestling style: Dynamic and high-impact, blending strength with agility.​
Signature moves: Bomb Valley Death (Sitout Powerbomb), various tag team maneuvers with Mikey Nicholls.​
Brief description: Shane Haste, alongside partner Mikey Nicholls, formed The Mighty Don't Kneel (TMDK), becoming a dominant force in NOAH's tag team division. Their chemistry and innovative offense earned them the GHC Tag Team Championship, making them one of the most celebrated teams in the promotion during their tenure.​

Shelton Benjamin
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2012–2015; competed as a member of the Suzuki-gun stable during their invasion angle. ​
Position on the card: Upper mid-card; participated in high-profile matches and title challenges.​
Wrestling style: Athletic and explosive, with a strong amateur wrestling background.​
Signature moves: Paydirt (Jumping Reverse STO), T-Bone Suplex.​
Brief description: Shelton Benjamin brought his athleticism and experience to NOAH during the Suzuki-gun invasion. Aligning with Minoru Suzuki's faction, Benjamin engaged in notable feuds and showcased his skills against NOAH's top talent, adding international flair to the promotion.​

Shinsuke Nakamura
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2013; participated in a significant inter-promotional match.​
Position on the card: Main event; IWGP Intercontinental Champion during his appearance.​
Wrestling style: Strong style with charismatic flair, incorporating striking and submission techniques.​
Signature moves: Kinshasa (Running Knee Strike), Cross Armbreaker.​
Brief description: Shinsuke Nakamura, representing New Japan Pro-Wrestling (NJPW), faced NOAH's Naomichi Marufuji in a high-profile match on September 8, 2013. This bout highlighted inter-promotional collaboration and showcased Nakamura's unique charisma and in-ring prowess to the NOAH audience.​

Shinya Hashimoto
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: December 23, 2000; participated in the "Great Voyage 2000" event. ​
Position on the card: Featured match; faced Takao Omori. ​
Wrestling style: Strong style, incorporating martial arts strikes and submissions.​
Signature moves: Diving DDT, Vertical Drop Brainbuster.​
Brief description: Shinya Hashimoto, renowned for his tenure in New Japan Pro-Wrestling (NJPW), made a notable appearance in Pro Wrestling NOAH during the "Great Voyage 2000" event, where he faced Takao Omori. This match marked one of his few appearances outside NJPW before he founded Pro Wrestling ZERO1 in 2001. ​

Shiro Koshinaka
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: Made appearances as a freelancer; participated in events such as the NOAH 20th Anniversary show on January 12, 2020. ​
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card; engaged in tag team matches.​
Wrestling style: Strong style with a mix of technical wrestling.​
Signature moves: Hip Attack, Powerbomb.​
Brief description: Shiro Koshinaka, a veteran of Japanese wrestling, has made sporadic appearances in Pro Wrestling NOAH as a freelancer. Notably, he participated in the NOAH 20th Anniversary event, teaming with Akitoshi Saito and Masao Inoue to secure a victory over 50 Funky Powers and Seiya Morohashi. ​

Shuhei Taniguchi
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: Debuted on December 24, 2005, and has been an active competitor since. 
Position on the card: Mid-card to main event; has held the GHC Tag Team Championship multiple times. ​
Wrestling style: Strong style with a focus on power moves and submissions.​
Signature moves: Wyvern Catch (modified German suplex), Soccer Kick. ​
Brief description: Shuhei Taniguchi, also known by his ring name Maybach Taniguchi, is a seasoned wrestler in Pro Wrestling NOAH. Trained by legends like Kenta Kobashi and Jun Akiyama, he has showcased his prowess in both singles and tag team divisions, capturing the GHC Tag Team Championship on multiple occasions. ​

Shuji Kondo
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: Has been an active competitor, with notable matches in 2024. ​
Position on the card: Junior heavyweight division; has held the GHC Junior Heavyweight Championship. ​
Wrestling style: Power-based offense with agility, characteristic of junior heavyweights.​
Signature moves: King Kong Lariat, Lanzarse, Gorilla Clutch. ​
Brief description: Shuji Kondo is a dynamic wrestler known for his strength and agility. Throughout his career, he has competed in various promotions, including Pro Wrestling NOAH, where he captured the GHC Junior Heavyweight Championship. His style blends power moves with the speed typical of junior heavyweights, making him a formidable opponent in the ring.​

Steve Corino
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: Steve Corino participated in Pro Wrestling NOAH events, notably teaming with Yutaka Yoshie to win the NWA Intercontinental Tag Team Championship on February 25, 2006. ​
Online World of Wrestling
Position on the card: Tag team competitor; held the NWA Intercontinental Tag Team Championship.​
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with a focus on old-school tactics and storytelling.​
Signature moves: Old School Expulsion (Lariat), Sliding Lariat.​
Brief description: Steve Corino, known for his tenure in various wrestling promotions, brought his experience to Pro Wrestling NOAH, where he achieved success in the tag team division by capturing the NWA Intercontinental Tag Team Championship alongside Yutaka Yoshie.​
Online World of Wrestling

Stinger
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2018–2024; formed on December 16, 2018, and disbanded on August 13, 2024. ​
Position on the card: Junior heavyweight division; held multiple championships, including the GHC Junior Heavyweight and GHC Junior Heavyweight Tag Team titles.​
Wrestling style: A blend of technical prowess and high-flying maneuvers, characteristic of junior heavyweight competitors.​
Signature moves: Varied among members; commonly featured precision strikes, submissions, and aerial techniques.​
Brief description: Stinger was a prominent stable in Pro Wrestling NOAH's junior heavyweight division, known for its technical excellence and strategic in-ring approach. The group underwent various iterations, with key members like Yoshinari Ogawa and Kotaro Suzuki leading the faction to multiple championship reigns. Their influence was significant in shaping NOAH's junior heavyweight scene during their active years. ​

Sugiura-gun
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: March 10, 2019 – April 16, 2023. ​
Position on the card: Prominent stable competing in both heavyweight and junior heavyweight divisions; members held various championships, including the GHC Heavyweight and Tag Team titles.​
Wrestling style: Diverse, reflecting the varied backgrounds of its members, ranging from technical wrestling to strong style and mixed martial arts influences.​
Signature moves: Varied among members; commonly featured hard-hitting strikes, submissions, and power-based maneuvers.​
Brief description: Sugiura-gun was a dominant stable in Pro Wrestling NOAH, founded and led by Takashi Sugiura. The group included notable wrestlers such as Kazma Sakamoto, Nosawa Rongai, and Kazushi Sakuraba. Throughout its existence, Sugiura-gun played a significant role in NOAH's storylines, with members capturing multiple championships and engaging in high-profile matches. The stable disbanded on April 16, 2023, following Sugiura's announcement that the group was no longer functioning effectively.

Super Crazy
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: Active competitor; participated in events such as "Sunny Voyage 2024." ​
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card; competed in singles and tag team matches.​Wrestling style: Lucha libre with a blend of high-flying maneuvers and technical skills.​
Signature moves: Moonsault Press, Sorpresa. ​
Brief description: Super Crazy, a Mexican luchador renowned for his high-flying style, has made notable appearances in Pro Wrestling NOAH. He has competed against various opponents, showcasing his agility and experience. His participation has added an international flair to NOAH's events, enriching the promotion's diverse wrestling styles. ​


Taiji Ishimori
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2006–2018. ​
Position on the card: Prominent junior heavyweight; held the GHC Junior Heavyweight Championship three times and the GHC Junior Heavyweight Tag Team Championship six times. ​
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical, characteristic of junior heavyweights.​
Signature moves: 450° Splash, Revolución (modified Emerald Flowsion), Superstar Elbow (rope rebound full rotation backflip elbow drop). ​
Brief description: Taiji Ishimori is renowned for his dynamic in-ring style and significant contributions to Pro Wrestling NOAH's junior heavyweight division. During his tenure, he set records for the longest single reign as GHC Junior Heavyweight Champion at 405 days and amassed multiple tag team championships. His tenure in NOAH established him as one of the most decorated junior heavyweights in the promotion's history. ​

Suzuki-gun
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2015–2016. ​
Position on the card: Dominant heel stable; members held all major NOAH championships during their invasion. ​
Wrestling style: Aggressive and rule-breaking tactics, characteristic of heel factions.​
Signature moves: Varied among members; commonly featured hard-hitting strikes, submissions, and power-based maneuvers.​
Brief description: Suzuki-gun, led by Minoru Suzuki, invaded Pro Wrestling NOAH in January 2015 as part of a storyline partnership with NJPW. The faction quickly asserted dominance by capturing all of NOAH's major titles, including the GHC Heavyweight Championship (Minoru Suzuki), GHC Tag Team Championship (Killer Elite Squad), GHC Junior Heavyweight Championship (Taichi), and GHC Junior Heavyweight Tag Team Championship (El Desperado and Taka Michinoku). This invasion storyline significantly impacted NOAH's landscape during that period. ​

TAJIRI
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: After departing WWE in 2005, TAJIRI competed in various Japanese promotions, including Pro Wrestling NOAH. ​
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card; engaged in both singles and tag team matches.​
Wrestling style: A hybrid of Japanese strong style and lucha libre, incorporating martial arts strikes and technical maneuvers.​
Signature moves: Buzzsaw Kick, Tarantula (rope-assisted Boston crab), Green Mist.​
Brief description: TAJIRI, renowned for his tenure in ECW and WWE, brought his unique blend of striking and technical prowess to Pro Wrestling NOAH. His participation added international experience and a distinctive in-ring style to the promotion.​

TAKA Michinoku
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2015–2016; returned for a match in 2023. ​
Position on the card: Junior heavyweight division; held the GHC Junior Heavyweight Tag Team Championship with El Desperado. ​
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical, characteristic of junior heavyweights.​
Signature moves: Michinoku Driver II (sitout scoop slam piledriver), Just Facelock (crossface).​
Brief description: TAKA Michinoku, a pioneer of the junior heavyweight style, contributed significantly to NOAH's junior division. His alliance with El Desperado as part of Suzuki-gun showcased his adaptability and experience.​

Takashi Sugiura
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: Debuted in 2000 and has been a mainstay since.​
Position on the card: Main event; multiple-time GHC Heavyweight Champion and GHC Tag Team Champion.​
Wrestling style: Strong style with a focus on strikes and submissions.​
Signature moves: Olympic Slam, Front Neck Lock.​
Brief description: Takashi Sugiura is a cornerstone of NOAH, known for his resilience and hard-hitting style. His leadership of the Sugiura-gun stable further cemented his legacy within the promotion.​


Takeshi Morishima
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: Debuted in 1998; active until 2015.​
Position on the card: Main event; former GHC Heavyweight Champion.​
Wrestling style: Power-based offense with agility uncommon for his size.​
Cagematch
Signature moves: Backdrop Driver, Lariat.​
Brief description: Takeshi Morishima was a dominant force in NOAH's heavyweight division, known for his impressive agility and strength. His reign as GHC Heavyweight Champion highlighted his prominence in the promotion.​
Takuma Sano
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2001–2012. ​
Position on the card: Competed in both junior heavyweight and heavyweight divisions; challenged for the GHC Heavyweight Championship and held the GHC Tag Team Championship with Yoshihiro Takayama. ​
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with martial arts influences, incorporating strikes and submissions.​
Signature moves: Rolling Sobat Kick, Northern Lights Bomb, Diving Foot Stomp. ​
Brief description: Takuma Sano, formerly known as Naoki Sano, transitioned from a successful junior heavyweight career to the heavyweight division in NOAH. He was part of a faction led by Akira Taue and had notable matches against top competitors like Kenta Kobashi and Mitsuharu Misawa. Sano's versatility and experience made him a respected figure in the promotion. ​

Tamon Honda
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2000–2010; continued to make occasional appearances as a freelancer post-2010. ​
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card; held the GHC Tag Team Championship and was a regular tag team competitor. ​
Wrestling style: Strong style with a foundation in amateur wrestling, utilizing suplexes and grappling techniques.​
Signature moves: Dead End (modified Olympic Slam), various suplex variations.​
Brief description: Tamon Honda, a former Olympic amateur wrestler, brought his grappling expertise to Pro Wrestling NOAH. He became a reliable performer in the tag team division, capturing the GHC Tag Team Championship. Honda's transition from amateur to professional wrestling showcased his adaptability and skill. ​

Tetsuya Endo
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: Made his debut on February 21, 2023, at Keiji Mutoh's Grand Final Pro-Wrestling "Last-Love" event. In 2024, he participated in six matches for NOAH's 'Limit Break' branch. As of January 2025, Endo announced an indefinite hiatus from DDT Pro-Wrestling to focus on competing regularly for NOAH. ​
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card; engaged in both singles and tag team matches.​
Signature moves: Shooting Star Press, Tetsuya in the Sky (springboard 450° splash).​
Brief description: Tetsuya Endo is a Japanese professional wrestler known for his dynamic in-ring style. After establishing himself in DDT Pro-Wrestling, he began appearing in Pro Wrestling NOAH in 2023. Influenced by legends like Jun Akiyama and Kenta Kobashi, Endo seeks to make a significant impact in NOAH's junior heavyweight division. ​

Timothy Thatcher
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: Debuted on June 7, 2022, and has been an active competitor since. ​
Position on the card: Upper mid-card; has held the GHC Tag Team Championship twice—once with Hideki Suzuki and once with Saxon Huxley. ​
Wrestling style: Technical and submission-based, emphasizing grappling and mat wrestling.​
Signature moves: Fujiwara Armbar, Butterfly Suplex.​
Brief description: Timothy Thatcher is an American professional wrestler renowned for his technical prowess. After his tenure with WWE, he joined Pro Wrestling NOAH in June 2022, aligning with Hideki Suzuki and later forming the stable "Real." Thatcher has made significant strides in NOAH's tag team division, capturing the GHC Tag Team Championship twice. ​

The Mighty Don't Kneel (TMDK)
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2011–2016. ​
Position on the card: Prominent tag team; Mikey Nicholls and Shane Haste were two-time GHC Tag Team Champions. ​
Wrestling style: Combination of power moves and high-impact maneuvers, showcasing strong team coordination.​
Signature moves: Thunder Valley (double fireman's carry slam), Tank Buster (spinebuster and neckbreaker combination).​
Brief description: TMDK, comprising Mikey Nicholls and Shane Haste, made a significant impact in Pro Wrestling NOAH's tag team division. Their dynamic style and cohesive teamwork led them to capture the GHC Tag Team Championship twice, establishing them as one of the premier teams in the promotion during their tenure. ​

Tomohiro Ishii
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: Notable appearances in 2024. ​
Position on the card: Featured in high-profile singles matches against top NOAH talent.​
Wrestling style: Strong style, characterized by hard-hitting strikes and resilience.​
Wikipedia, la enciclopedia libre
Signature moves: Vertical Drop Brainbuster, Sliding Lariat.​
Brief description: Tomohiro Ishii, primarily associated with New Japan Pro-Wrestling (NJPW), made impactful appearances in Pro Wrestling NOAH in 2024. His matches, particularly against Masa Kitamiya, showcased his tenacity and hard-hitting style, resonating with NOAH's audience. ​

Toshiaki Kawada
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: Notable match on July 18, 2005, at NOAH's Destiny event. ​
Position on the card: Featured in marquee matches, including a significant bout against Mitsuharu Misawa.​
Wrestling style: Strong style, emphasizing stiff strikes and submission holds.​
Signature moves: Dangerous K (high-angle powerbomb), Ganmengiri (face kick).​
Brief description: Toshiaki Kawada, a legend in Japanese professional wrestling, made a notable appearance in Pro Wrestling NOAH during the Destiny event in 2005, facing his long-time rival Mitsuharu Misawa. This match was significant, as it brought their storied rivalry from All Japan Pro Wrestling into the NOAH ring, offering fans a nostalgic and hard-hitting contest. ​

Tsuyoshi Kikuchi
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2000–2010. ​
Position on the card: Primarily competed in opening matches and the low midcard; participated in tournaments for the GHC Junior Heavyweight Championship and held the IWGP Junior Heavyweight Tag Team Championship with Yoshinobu Kanemaru. ​
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with influences from Dynamite Kid, emphasizing agility and resilience.​
Signature moves: Diving Headbutt, German Suplex, Missile Dropkick.​
Brief description: Tsuyoshi Kikuchi, known for his energetic and tenacious wrestling style, transitioned from All Japan Pro Wrestling to Pro Wrestling NOAH in 2000. While often positioned in the midcard, he achieved notable success by winning the IWGP Junior Heavyweight Tag Team Championship alongside Yoshinobu Kanemaru. Kikuchi's dedication and in-ring prowess made him a respected figure among peers and fans alike. ​
Wikipedia

Último Dragón
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: Notable appearances in 2003 and 2022. ​
Position on the card: Featured in special attraction matches, including participation in the Differ Cup (2003) and NOAH DEPARTURE 2022 event. ​
Wrestling style: A fusion of Japanese puroresu and Mexican lucha libre, characterized by high-flying maneuvers and technical proficiency.​
Signature moves: Asai Moonsault, Dragon Sleeper, La Magistral Cradle.​
Brief description: Último Dragón, born Yoshihiro Asai, is a legendary figure in professional wrestling, renowned for blending Japanese and Mexican wrestling styles. In Pro Wrestling NOAH, he showcased his versatility by teaming with various talents and participating in high-profile events, such as the Differ Cup in 2003 and the DEPARTURE 2022 event, where he teamed with Harada, Kotoge, and Ohara against NOSAWA, Eita, YO-HEY, and Kotaro. His contributions have left an indelible mark on NOAH's international appeal. ​

Voodoo Murders
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: The Voodoo Murders, primarily known for their presence in All Japan Pro Wrestling (AJPW), also made appearances in Pro Wrestling NOAH. The group, led by TARU, was active in NOAH during certain periods, bringing their villainous tactics to the promotion. ​
Puroresu System Wiki
Position on the card: As a heel stable, they engaged in feuds with various NOAH wrestlers, contributing to storylines that emphasized their disruptive and chaotic nature.​
Wrestling style: Known for their brawling tactics, interference in matches, and use of weapons, embodying the archetype of a villainous wrestling faction.​
Signature moves: Members employed a variety of finishing moves, often utilizing underhanded tactics to secure victories.​
Brief description: The Voodoo Murders were a notorious heel stable in Japanese professional wrestling, recognized for their rule-breaking antics and dominance in promotions like AJPW and NOAH. Their involvement in NOAH added a layer of unpredictability and intensity to the promotion's events during their tenure. ​

War Machine (Hanson and Raymond Rowe)
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: War Machine made their debut in Pro Wrestling NOAH on September 14, 2015, and competed in the promotion during that period. ​
Position on the card: Featured prominently in the tag team division, engaging in high-profile matches against established teams.​
Wrestling style: A blend of power and agility, characterized by high-impact moves and cohesive teamwork.​
Signature moves: Fallout (combination of a belly-to-back suplex by Rowe and a diving leg drop by Hanson) and other power-based tandem maneuvers.​
Brief description: War Machine, consisting of Hanson and Raymond Rowe, brought their formidable tag team presence to Pro Wrestling NOAH in 2015. Their tenure included notable matches that showcased their strength and versatility, contributing to the competitiveness of NOAH's tag team division. ​
Puroresu System Wiki

YO-HEY
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: Debuted in 2017 and has been an active competitor since. ​
Position on the card: Prominent figure in the junior heavyweight division; has held the GHC Junior Heavyweight Tag Team Championship multiple times. ​
Wrestling style: High-flying and agile, incorporating elements of lucha libre.​
Signature moves: Dropkick variations, springboard maneuvers, and innovative aerial attacks.​
Brief description: YO-HEY is a dynamic junior heavyweight wrestler known for his charisma and in-ring versatility. Since joining Pro Wrestling NOAH in 2017, he has become a key player in the junior heavyweight division, capturing the GHC Junior Heavyweight Tag Team Championship on multiple occasions. His high-energy performances and unique style have made him a fan favorite. ​

Yoshiaki Fujiwara
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: Made special appearances in the early 2000s.​
Position on the card: Featured in special attraction matches, often highlighting his legendary status and technical prowess.​
Wrestling style: Technical and submission-based, renowned for his expertise in catch wrestling.​
Signature moves: Fujiwara Armbar, headbutts.​
Brief description: Yoshiaki Fujiwara is a legendary figure in Japanese professional wrestling, known for his technical mastery and contributions to the sport. In Pro Wrestling NOAH, he made special appearances that showcased his enduring skills and cemented his legacy as a master technician.​

Yoshiaki Yatsu
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: Competed sporadically in the early 2000s.​
Position on the card: Participated in special matches, often teaming with or facing other veterans.​
Wrestling style: Power-based, utilizing his amateur wrestling background.​
Signature moves: German suplex, lariat.​
Brief description: Yoshiaki Yatsu, an accomplished amateur and professional wrestler, brought his robust style to Pro Wrestling NOAH in the early 2000s. His appearances added a layer of experience and nostalgia to NOAH's events, resonating with long-time fans.​

Yoshihiro Takayama
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: Joined in 2000; notable tenure until 2017. 
Position on the card: Prominent heavyweight competitor; held the GHC Heavyweight Championship.​
Wrestling style: Strong style, incorporating stiff strikes and submission holds.​
Signature moves: Everest German Suplex, Knee Strikes.​
Brief description: Yoshihiro Takayama, known for his imposing presence and resilience, became a significant figure in Pro Wrestling NOAH after joining in 2000. He captured the GHC Heavyweight Championship on September 7, 2002, by defeating Yoshinari Ogawa, showcasing his dominance in the promotion. Takayama's tenure in NOAH solidified his status as a formidable heavyweight in Japanese professional wrestling. 
​

Yoshinari Ogawa
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: Founding member in 2000; retired in 2024. 
Position on the card: Versatile competitor; achieved Grand Slam Champion status in NOAH. 
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling, emphasizing clever tactics and reversals.​
Signature moves: Backdrop Suplex, European Clutch.​
Brief description: Yoshinari Ogawa, often referred to as "Rat Boy" for his cunning in-ring tactics, played a pivotal role in Pro Wrestling NOAH since its inception in 2000. He achieved the distinction of being a Grand Slam Champion in NOAH, capturing the GHC Heavyweight, Junior Heavyweight, Tag Team, and Junior Tag Team Championships. Ogawa's technical prowess and mentorship have left an indelible mark on the promotion. He retired in August 2024 due to a neck injury.
​
Yoshiki Inamura
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: Debuted in 2018; active competitor.​
Position on the card: Rising star in the heavyweight division.​
Wrestling style: Power-based offense, utilizing strength and impact moves.​
Signature moves: Power Slam, Shoulder Tackle.​
Brief description: Yoshiki Inamura is recognized as one of NOAH's promising heavyweights, known for his impressive strength and determination. Since his debut in 2018, he has been steadily climbing the ranks, showcasing potential to become a future mainstay in the promotion's heavyweight division.​

Yoshinobu Kanemaru
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: Joined in 2000; competed until 2016.​
Position on the card: Prominent figure in the junior heavyweight division; multiple-time GHC Junior Heavyweight Champion.​
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying hybrid.​
Signature moves: Deep Impact (Diving DDT), Touch-Out (Brainbuster).​
Brief description: Yoshinobu Kanemaru established himself as a cornerstone of NOAH's junior heavyweight division. His tenure from 2000 to 2016 was marked by numerous title reigns and standout matches, solidifying his reputation as a skilled and versatile competitor.​

Yuji Nagata
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: Participated intermittently from 2002, with significant involvement between 2012 and 2015. ​
Position on the card: Featured as a top-tier competitor; achieved notable success by winning the GHC Heavyweight Championship.​
Wrestling style: Strong style, emphasizing powerful strikes and technical grappling.​
Signature moves: Backdrop Hold (Bridging Belly-to-Back Suplex), Nagata Lock (Crossface Submission).​
New Japan Pro-Wrestling Wiki
Brief description: Yuji Nagata, a distinguished figure in Japanese professional wrestling, extended his illustrious career into Pro Wrestling NOAH. In November 2013, he won NOAH's Global League Tournament, becoming the first wrestler to have won NJPW's G1 Climax, AJPW's Champion Carnival, and NOAH's Global League. This victory led to a GHC Heavyweight Championship match, where he defeated Takeshi Morishima on February 8, 2014, to claim the title. Nagata's tenure in NOAH further cemented his legacy as a versatile and accomplished wrestler across multiple major Japanese promotions. ​

Yuji Hino
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: Debuted in 2018; active competitor. ​
Position on the card: Prominent in the tag team division; held the GHC Tag Team Championship with Maybach Taniguchi.​
Wrestling style: Power-based offense, utilizing strength and impactful maneuvers.​
Signature moves: Fucking Bomb (Sitout Powerbomb), Sekaiichi no German Suplex Hold.​
Brief description: Yuji Hino, known for his formidable strength and commanding presence, joined Pro Wrestling NOAH in 2018. He quickly made an impact by teaming with Maybach Taniguchi to form "The Hooligans," capturing the GHC Tag Team Championship on December 16, 2018, by defeating Go Shiozaki and Katsuhiko Nakajima. Hino's tenure in NOAH showcased his dominance in the tag team division and reinforced his reputation as a powerhouse in the Japanese wrestling scene. ​

Yusuke Okada
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: There is no verified record of Yusuke Okada competing in Pro Wrestling NOAH.​
Position on the card: Not applicable.​
Wrestling style: Not applicable.​
Signature moves: Not applicable.​
Brief description: Yusuke Okada is a Japanese professional wrestler who began his career with All Japan Pro Wrestling (AJPW) in 2017, where he was part of the Evolution stable and won the 2019 Jr. Tag Battle of Glory. He later joined DDT Pro-Wrestling (DDT) in December 2020 and became a member of the Burning stable. Okada retired from professional wrestling on November 22, 2024.

Yutaka Yoshie
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: Debuted on February 6, 2010. ​
Position on the card: Competed as a heavyweight wrestler; participated in notable singles matches.​
Wrestling style: Power-based offense, utilizing his sumo background and judo expertise.​
Signature moves: Diving Body Press, Lariat.​
Brief description: Yutaka Yoshie, known for his robust physique and strength, brought a unique blend of sumo and judo techniques to professional wrestling. After a successful run in New Japan Pro-Wrestling, where he held the IWGP Tag Team Championship, Yoshie transitioned to Pro Wrestling NOAH in 2010. He made an impactful debut by defeating Shuhei Taniguchi, showcasing his dominance in the heavyweight division. Yoshie's career spanned various promotions, highlighting his versatility and enduring presence in the Japanese wrestling scene. 

​Zack Sabre Jr.
Time in Pro Wrestling NOAH: 2008–2015. ​
Position on the card: Prominent figure in the junior heavyweight division; two-time GHC Junior Heavyweight Tag Team Champion with Yoshinari Ogawa. ​
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling, focusing on intricate submission holds and chain wrestling.​
Signature moves: European Clutch, Orienteering With Napalm Death (grounded octopus hold).​
Brief description: Zack Sabre Jr., hailing from England, established himself as a premier technical wrestler during his tenure with Pro Wrestling NOAH from 2008 to 2015. His alliance with Yoshinari Ogawa led to two reigns as GHC Junior Heavyweight Tag Team Champions, underscoring his prowess in the junior heavyweight division. Sabre's style is characterized by a sophisticated application of submission techniques, earning him recognition as one of the best technical wrestlers globally. ​



